Clinical indicators of dehydration severity in elderly patients.To determine which of the signs and symptoms of dehydration obtainable from patient history and physical examination in the emergency department are most useful in assessing the severity of dehydration in elderly patients.Prospective, correlational study.Two university teaching hospitals.Fifty-five patients aged 60 or older presenting to the emergency department with suspected dehydration were studied.In the emergency department, patients were evaluated by a standardized history and physical examination that included assessment of 38 signs and symptoms commonly attributed to dehydration. The relationships between the presence and intensity of these putative dehydration indicators and an independent rating of dehydration severity based on a comprehensive review of the medical record were evaluated. Also evaluated were the relationships between these dehydration indicators and patient age. Indicators that correlated best with dehydration severity but were unrelated to patient age included: tongue dryness (P less than 0.001), longitudinal tongue furrows (P less than 0.001), dryness of the mucous membranes of the mouth (P less than 0.001), upper body muscle weakness (P less than 0.001), confusion (P less than 0.001), speech difficulty (P less than 0.01), and sunkenness of eyes (P less than 0.01). Other indicators had only weak associations with dehydration severity or were also related to age. Patient thirst was unrelated to dehydration severity.A set of signs and symptoms related to dehydration severity in elderly patients has been identified. These indicators may be more useful for evaluation of dehydration severity in the emergency department than other commonly used indicators.Hyponatremia among the institutionalized elderly in 2 long-term care facilities in Taipei.Hyponatremia is common in the institutionalized elderly, and syndrome of inappropriate antidiuretic hormone secretion was deemed the most important etiologic factor. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the prevalence and etiologic factors of hyponatremia among institutionalized elderly and to explore its association with nutritional status.Subjects in 2 private long-term care facilities (LTCFs) participated in this study. Periodic nutritional evaluations, including anthropometric measurements and serial laboratory examinations, were performed every 6 months. When hyponatremia was identified, serum osmolality, serum levels of cortisol, thyrotropin, antidiuretic hormone, urine osmolality, and electrolyte profile were done instantly. Water loading tests were performed for subjects with euvolemic, hypo-osmolar hyponatremia. Nutritional status (i.e. hemoglobin, serum albumin, serum total cholesterol, body mass index [BMI], and mean body weight loss within 6 months) was compared between hyponatremic and normonatremic subjects during hyponatremic episodes and at follow-up (6 months later).In total, 67 (mean age = 77.2 +/- 8.8 years, M/F = 45/22) LTCF residents were enrolled. The prevalence of hyponatremia was 31.3% (21/67) during the 6-month period, and 62.5% of these cases were related to reset osmostat. In addition, BMI was similar between hyponatremic and normonatremic subjects during hyponatremic episodes (19.1 +/- 3.2 vs 20.5 +/- 4.0 kg/m2, p = 0.16), but became significantly lower in hyponatremic subjects 6 months later (18.5 +/- 3.2 vs 20.8 +/- 4.2 kg/m2, p = 0.027). However, the mean body weight loss during the 6-month follow-up was similar (3.0% vs 0.8%, p = 0.25). Furthermore, hemoglobin and serum levels of albumin were similar between groups during hyponatremic episodes and at follow-ups, but serum levels of total cholesterol were significantly lower in hyponatremic subjects on both occasions (166.9 +/- 30.5 vs 190.2 +/- 38.2 mg/dL, p = 0.016 during hyponatremic episodes and 153.6 +/- 29.4 vs 182.8 +/- 35.5 mg/dL, p = 0.003 at follow-up).About a third of LTC-dwelling elderly would experience hyponatremia during the 6-month period, and 62.5% of them were due to reset osmostat. The relationship between hyponatremia and undernutrition deserves further investigation.Estimation of body composition by bioelectrical impedance in cancer patients.Measurement of body composition is important in the assessment of nutritional status in cancer patients. The purpose of this study was to validate the bioelectrical impedance (BI) method for body composition estimation in 33 elderly cancer patients (mean age 66 +/- 9 years) using the deuterium dilution technique (2H2O) as the reference method. Height2/Resistance (H2/R) correlated significantly with total body water (TBW) computed from 2H2O (r = 0.89, P less than 0.001; s.e.e. = 2.4 l). The prediction equation for TBW improved significantly (P less than 0.001) by addition of H2/R to the predictor variables weight, height, age and sex. We conclude that BI is a useful measure for the assessment of body composition in cancer patients.Volaemic assessment of the elderly hyponatraemic patient: reliability of clinical assessment and validation of bioelectrical impedance analysis.Hyponatraemia is the commonest electrolyte disturbance of hospital inpatients. Assessment of volaemic status is an important part of diagnosis and management.To determine reliability of clinical assessment of volaemic state by assessing inter-observer variability of clinical measures of volaemic state. To assess validity of bioelectrical impedance analysis as a tool to measure total body water in elderly hyponatraemic patients.Observational study conducted in a Department of Medicine for the Elderly.Hospital inpatients >65 years old (n=22) with serum sodium concentration <130 mmol/l were included. Two assessors determined volaemic state on two occasions 72 h apart. Level of agreement between observers was determined on each occasion. Total body water estimation was undertaken with bioelectrical impedance analysis and measurement of dilution of deuterium oxide. Correlation between these two measures was then analysed.Cohen's κ for agreement between two observers for overall assessment of volaemic state was 0.59 (P<0.01). Values for agreement between individual clinical markers of volaemic state ranged between 0.16 and 0.45. Pearson correlation coefficient (r) for correlation between estimation of total body water undertaken by bioelectrical impedance analysis and by measurement of dilution of deuterium oxide was 0.69 (P<0.001).There was moderate inter-observer agreement of overall clinical volaemic assessment of elderly hyponatraemic patients. Total body water estimation by bioelectrical impedance analysis correlates well with estimation by measurement of dilution of deuterium oxide, providing a potentially useful tool to improve the management of the elderly hyponatraemic patient.Biochemical and body composition analysis of nocturia in the elderly.Nocturia is a common symptom in the elderly, and various contributing factors have been suggested. Therefore, in order to investigate which factors are strongly related to occurrence of nocturia, we performed a suite of examinations.One hundred eighty volunteers were divided into three groups: a young adult control group (60 healthy persons without nocturia), an elderly control group (60 healthy persons with a low mean frequency of nocturnal urination, i.e., <once per night), and an elderly nocturia group (60 healthy persons with a high mean frequency of nocturnal urination, i.e., more than twice per night). Biochemistry tests, measurement of the osmotic pressure of plasma and urine, and body composition analysis were performed in three groups during the daytime and nighttime. In the elderly control group and the elderly nocturia group, measurement of blood pressure and recording of urinary frequency-volume charts were performed.The features specific to the elderly nocturia group are as follows: (1) a decrease of the nighttime plasma melatonin level, (2) an increase of nighttime plasma catecholamine levels, (3) an increase of daytime and nighttime plasma natriuretic peptide levels, (4) an increase of blood pressure, (5) a decrease of daytime and nighttime urinary osmotic pressure, (6) an increase of total urine volume, and (7) an increase of the edema ratio before sleeping.These results suggest that sleep disturbance, hypertension, and excessive fluid intake are major factors contributing to an increased frequency of nocturnal urination (>twice per night) in the elderly.Reducing hydration-linked events in nursing home residents.The authors used a quasi-experimental treatment and control group design with 49 participants from four nursing homes to test the effectiveness of an 8-week hydration intervention in reducing hydration-linked events (HLEs). A Kaplan Meier survival curve with log rank test was calculated to determine incidence and time to occurrence of a HLE. Incidence of and time to a HLE did not differ between the treatment and control groups over an 8-week period (p > .05). However, treatment group participants were found to be more frail, more cognitively impaired and more at risk for acute confusion than the control group participants. Although there were no statistically significant differences between the groups, it is clinically significant that the frailer, more at-risk participants in the treatment group had a lower incidence of HLEs.Indices of dehydration among frail nursing home patients: highly variable but stable over time.To determine changes in standard laboratory measures of dehydration among residents of a nursing home care unit (NHCU) over a 6-month period.A prospective cohort analytic study.A 130-bed NHCU in a Department of Veterans Affairs Hospital.Fifteen infirm but stable male residents (mean age 77 years; range (R) 62-93) on one ward of the NHCU.We studied prospectively for 6 months the serum osmolality (osm), serum sodium (Na), blood urea nitrogen/creatinine (BUN/Cr) ratios and weight (wt) for 15 patients of the NHCU. None of the patients was acutely ill during the study period or exhibited clinical signs of dehydration.Mean serum osm at baseline: 291.6 mOsm/kg (R 278 to 300); 3 months: 291.5 mOsm/kg (R 276 to 301); 6 months: 291.3 mOsm/kg (R 283-300) were all similar. Forty percent (6/15) of patients had at least one high normal/elevated reading (> or = 295 mOsm/kg) during the study. Three patients (20%) had readings of > or = 300 mOsm/kg, but none of these patients had either concurrent increased serum Na (> or = 146 mmole/L) or BUN/Cr ratios (> or = 25). Mean serum Na at baseline: 143.0 mmole/L (R 139-148); 3 months: 142.1 mmole/L (R 138-149); 6 months: 142.9 mmole/L (R 137-150) were all similar. Sixty percent (9/15) of the patients maintained normal (nl) serum Na levels throughout the study. The relationship between the change in serum Na and serum osm levels from baseline to 6 months was not significant (r = 0.242). BUN/Cr ratios ranged from 12-34 over the study period with 3 of 15 patients (20%) demonstrating elevated ratios consistently throughout the study without clinical evidence of dehydration. Only two patients had both high nl/elevated serum osm and elevated serum Na, although both had nl BUN/Cr ratios. Neither of these patients was thought by staff to be clinically dehydrated. Analysis of variance (ANOVA) indicated none of the laboratory measures changed significantly over time (serum osm: F(2,28) < 1; Na: F(2,28) < 1; BUN/Cr: F(2,28) < 1). There was no significant change in weight between the baseline and six month readings.These data suggest that in the presence of clinical stability, long-term care residents may have a serum osm in the high normal/elevated range without overt clinical evidence of dehydration, an accompanying elevated Na, or BUN/Cr ratio. This may indicate a different central osm setting for these residents as the serum osm appeared to be stable for each resident over time. These data also suggest that measures of serum osm, Na, and BUN/Cr in the long-term care setting may accurately predict future laboratory values in an individual patient if baseline values are drawn when the patient is not acutely ill.Association of plasma adiponectin levels with cellular hydration state measured using bioelectrical impedance analysis in patients with COPD.It is widely recognized that chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) includes a variety of extra pulmonary complications and comorbidities. Recently, adiponectin was shown to regulate cellular metabolism in humans. Cellular hydration state is affected by a variety of hormonal factors and regulates cellular metabolic state. Therefore, this study was designed to determine whether adiponectin is a possible factor involved in cellular hydration state in COPD.Thirty patients with COPD and 41 age-matched controls participated in the study. Plasma levels of total and high molecular weight (HMW) adiponectin were measured and anthropometry and pulmonary function tests were conducted. Intracellular water (ICW), extracellular water (ECW), and ECW/ICW ratio, which are parameters of cellular hydration state, were measured using bioelectrical impedance analysis.Higher levels of total and HMW adiponectin in plasma were found in patients with COPD compared with levels in controls. A significant inverse correlation was observed between body mass index and plasma levels of total and HMW adiponectin in the control group. However, this significant correlation was not observed in patients with COPD. The plasma levels of total and HMW adiponectin were also not significantly correlated with any pulmonary function parameters in patients with COPD. Regarding the state of cellular hydration, the plasma levels of total adiponectin were inversely correlated with the ECW/ICW ratio and positively with ICW values in patients with COPD. Moreover, closer correlations were found between these parameters and plasma HMW adiponectin levels.The results of the present study suggest a novel association of the plasma adiponectin with cellular hydration state in patients with COPD. Accordingly, lower adiponectin levels may result in cellular shrinkage, leading to metabolic malfunction at a cellular level. Thus, our findings provide new insights regarding the preventive roles of adiponectin in the progression of comorbidities in COPD.A comparison of water turnover in older people in community and institutional settings.Maintaining water balance is essential for health, but environmental factors, pathology and the ageing process can adversely affect water homeostasis.This study examined the relationship between physical dependency and daily water turnover rate in an older population.Daily water turnover (DWT) was estimated, using deuterium oxide ((2)H(2)O) as a tracer for water, over two separate 7-day periods in summer and winter in two older populations. The independent group (N = 22) lived in their own homes and were self-caring. The dependent group (N = 15) lived in institutional care, and were more physically dependent. None of the subjects had significant mental impairment. Total body water (TBW) and DWT were estimated from the equilibration concentration of ingested (2)H(2)O and its subsequent elimination rate.The independent group had a median (range) age of 75(69-88) y, a mean Barthel Index (BI) of 19.8, and a mean Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT) score of 9.8. The dependent group were older (83(72-93) y), with a mean BI of 13 and a mean AMT of 9.3. Average median (range) DWT in the independent group was similar in summer (2.2(1.3-3.6) l.d(-1)) and winter (2.1(1.4-3.6) l.d(-1)), but faster than in the dependent group (1.5(0.9-2.9) and 1.6(1.0-2.8) l.d(-1), respectively) during the same two periods. Median urine output in the independent group was similar in summer (1.7(0.8-3.3) l.d(-1)) and winter (1.7(0.9-3.2) l.d(-1)), but greater than in the dependent group (1.1(0.6-2.7) and 0.9(0.5-1.6) l.d(-1), respectively).These results show that the water turnover rate of many older people is low, and that intake may be affected especially in those with physical disability.Validation of multi-frequency bioelectrical impedance analysis in detecting changes in fluid balance of geriatric patients.Multi-Frequency Bioelectrical Impedance Analysis (MFBIA) is a quick, simple, and inexpensive method to assess body fluid compartments. This study aimed at determining the validity of MFBIA in detecting clinically relevant changes of fluid balance in geriatric patients.A prospective, observational study.The 22-bed Geriatric Department of the University Hospital Nijmegen.Hospitalized patients were eligible if they did not have a pacemaker, were not suffering from terminal illnesses, and did not have psychogeriatric diseases likely to interfere with capacity to consent or comply. During a 16-months period, 218 patients were admitted, of whom 78 patients were eligible and 53 consented to participate.Each subject's fluid balance was diagnosed twice a week as dehydrated, overhydrated, or euvolemic, based on standardized physical examination, laboratory tests, and weight evaluation. Changes in fluid balance were quantified by measuring total body water (TBW) and extracellular fluid (ECF) applying deuterium- and bromide-dilution techniques. Impedance at 1, 5, 50, and 100 kHz and body weight were measured daily. Sensitivity and Guyatt's responsiveness indexes of MFBIA in detecting dehydration and overhydration were determined.In total, 1071 MFBIA measurements were performed, during which 14 transitions from dehydration to euvolemia and 13 transitions from overhydration to euvolemia were monitored. Rehydration of dehydrated patients caused an increase in TBW and ECF of 3.4 +/- 1.8 L and 1.9 +/- 1.9 L, respectively, which resulted in significant decreases in impedance of 133 +/- 67 omega at 1 kHz and 93 +/- 61 omega at 100 kHz (P = .001). Treatment of overhydrated patients caused a TBW and ECF loss of 3.8 +/- 4.2 L and 3.1 +/- 3.8 L, respectively, which resulted in significant increases in impedance of 104 +/- 72 omega at 1 kHz and 81 +/- 68 omega at 100 kHz (P < .001). Sensitivity of a single MFBIA in diagnosing dehydration and overhydration was 14% and 17%, respectively. Responsiveness indexes of weighing and MFBIA for dehydration and overhydration were similar at all frequencies and greater than one.The sensitivity of a single impedance measurement in detecting dehydration and overhydration was low. However, responsiveness of serial measurements to intra-individual changes in fluid balance was good. Therefore, this noninvasive technique may be used in clinical practice to improve monitoring fluid balance in geriatric patients, especially when daily weighing is difficult.Fluid balance in elderly patients following acute stroke.We studied the relationship between plasma osmolality, arginine vasopressin (AVP), and fluid input in patients during the acute phase of a first stroke. Fifteen consecutive patients were studied (median age 79) and their blood sampled on days 0, 1, 2, 3, 7 and 14. Plasma osmolality was related to fluid input over days 0-3 (p = 0.0013) and AVP over 14 days (p less than 0.001). Patients with a poor outcome had higher AVP concentrations (p = 0.02). Those on intravenous fluids received a higher volume (p less than 0.01) and had a lower plasma osmolality (p = 0.04). The results of this preliminary study indicate that a standard regime for fluid input is inappropriate.Prediction of body composition in elderly men over 75 years of age.A comprehensive number of body composition predictions (involving weight, height, skinfold thicknesses, bioelectrical impedance and near-infrared interactance-NIRI) were evaluated against total body water (TBW from isotope dilution), in 23 randomly selected men over 75 years old, and dual-energy X-ray absorptiometry (DXA), in 15 volunteers from this group. Comparisons were made between anthropometric and impedance methods for estimating limb muscle mass (obtained using DXA). Bias and 95% limits of agreement between measured TBW and DXA estimates were -2.1 kg and 3.1 kg, respectively (for fat, 5.4% and 6.1% body weight). Agreement between TBW predictions and reference measurements was remarkably variable, irrespective of whether TBW was predicted from TBW-specific equations or indirectly from estimates of fat or fat-free mass: for predictions using anthropometry, bias ranged from -4.7 kg to 1.6 kg and 95% limits of agreement from bias +/- 3.8 kg to +/- 5.0 kg; using impedance, bias was -8.8 kg to 3.2 kg and 95% limits of agreement were bias +/- 3.6 kg to +/- 7.8 kg; corresponding values for NIRI were -5.3 kg and +/- 5.4 kg. Although some non-age-specific equations appeared valid, age-specific equations generally predicted TBW better. Limb muscle mass (DXA) was predicted better using the segmental impedance method, from indices of limb muscle area (r = 0.76; SEE = 1.9 kg) and volume (r = 0.86; SEE = 1.6 kg), than by anthropometry alone (r = 0.61 and 0.71; SEE = 2.3 kg and 2.1 kg, respectively). In conclusion, some body composition predictions are unacceptable (at least for TBW) in older men, and care is recommended when selecting from these methods or equations. Also, the segmental impedance method is as good as, if not better than, anthropometry alone in predicting limb muscle mass (DXA) in older men.Hypernatremia in hospitalized patients.To determine the incidence, clinical characteristics, and outcome for general medical-surgical hospital patients with hypernatremia.A prospective cohort study.A 942-bed urban university hospital.All patients who developed a serum sodium concentration of 150 mmol/L or greater during a 3-month observation period.Daily fluid balance, mental status, and serum and urine electrolytes and osmolality.103 patients were identified. Eighteen patients were hypernatremic on hospital admission, and 85 developed hypernatremia during hospitalization. Patients who developed hypernatremia during hospitalization were younger than patients who developed hypernatremia before hospital admission (mean age +/- SD, 58.9 +/- 19.2 years compared with 76.6 +/- 16.6 years; P < 0.01) but did not differ in age from the patients of the general hospitalized population. Eighty-nine percent of patients who developed hypernatremia during hospitalization had urine concentrating defects, primarily as the result of the use of diuretics or of solute diuresis, whereas only 50% of patients who were hypernatremic on admission could be shown to have concentrating defects (P < 0.01). Fifty-five percent of all hypernatremic patients had increased insensible water losses, and 35% had increased enteral water losses. Eighty-six percent of patients with hospital-acquired hypernatremia lacked free access to water, 74% had enteral water intake of less than 1 L/d, and 94% received less than 1 L of intravenous electrolyte-free water per day during the development of hypernatremia. No supplemental electrolyte-free water was prescribed during the first 24 hours of hypernatremia in 49% of patients. The duration of hypernatremia was shorter in patients who were hypernatremic on admission (median duration, 3 days) than in patients with hospital-acquired hypernatremia (median duration, 5 days; P < 0.05). Mortality was 41% for all patients, but hypernatremia was judged to have contributed to mortality in only 16% of patients.Although the development of hypernatremia before hospital admission occurs primarily in geriatric patients, hospital-acquired hypernatremia was more common in our cohort and had an age distribution similar to that of the general hospitalized population. Hospital-acquired hypernatremia was primarily iatrogenic, resulting from inadequate and inappropriate prescription of fluids to patients with predictably increased water losses and impaired thirst or restricted free water intake or both. Treatment of hypernatremia is often inadequate or delayed. Efforts to manage hypernatremia better and altogether avoid hospital-acquired hypernatremia should focus on both physician education and the development of hospital systems to prevent errors in fluid prescription.[Accumulated fluid balance in patients admitted to the ICU: is it really reliable?].In most of the textbooks, it is considered that the balance calculated after admission and the losses measured and/or estimated is an inexact way of establishing the real balance. Thus daily monitoring of the weight variations is recommended as a single possible alternative. On the other hand, there are few studies that have strictly studied the reliability of the fluid balance calculated. We also have not found any study in middle-long stay critical patients. These circumstances have led us to design an observational prospective study that will allow us to know if the accumulated balance calculated after admission and loses adequately reflect the weight changes in middle-long stay patients. We include 20 patients who were weighed every 48 hours (at least 3 times each one) and we compare the weight changes with the balances calculated. We find that, above all after the 6th day, the accumulated balance calculated adequately reflected the weight changes (mean error/day < 250 ml), regardless of the presence or not of fever, sweat, oral diet, feces or mechanical ventilation. When weight on admission to the ICU was less than 75 kg, the changes in the balance calculated adjusted even more to the weight change, the contrary occurring when the weight was greater than 75 kg. These findings suggest that the accumulated balance calculated represents a valid alternative to daily weighing of the patients and that factors such as body mass and/or surface should be taken into account to reach more exact estimations.Body composition by bioelectrical-impedance analysis compared with deuterium dilution and skinfold anthropometry in patients with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.Body composition is an important measure of nutritional status in patients with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD). We generated a regression model for bioelectrical impedance (BI) by using deuterium dilution (2H2O) as a reference method in 32 COPD patients, aged 63 +/- 9 y (mean +/- SD), in stable pulmonary and cardiac condition. Height squared divided by resistance (Ht2/Res) correlated well with total body water (TBW) as measured by 2H2O (r = 0.93, P less than 0.001, SEE = 1.9 L). The best-fitting regression equation to predict TBW comprised Ht2/Res and body weight (r2 = 0.89, SEE = 1.8 L, P less than 0.001). BI-predicted TBW was used to estimate BI-fat-free mass (FFM) that was compared with skinfold-thickness-based FFM predictions (Anthr-FFM). Relative to BI-FFM a significant overestimation of 4.4 +/- 0.8 kg was found by Anthr-FFM. Our results suggest that BI is a useful measure of body composition in patients with severe COPD.Efficacy of desmopressin in treatment of refractory nocturia in patients older than 65 years.To evaluate the efficacy of desmopressin treatment in patients 65 years old and older with nocturia and to determine whether baseline urodynamic characteristics influenced the outcome of treatment.Patients with nocturia three or more times a night and nocturnal polyuria refractory to medication were treated with oral desmopressin 0.1 mg at bedtime for 4 weeks. Data from urodynamic studies and a voiding diary, nocturnal urine volume, urine specific gravity, serum sodium and potassium level, and quality of life index were measured at baseline, 4 weeks, and 4 weeks after discontinuation of treatment.A total of 30 patients (25 men and 5 women) were enrolled in the study. The mean age was 75.4 +/- 6.6 years. Five patients (16.7%) reported side effects, including hyponatremia in one. Twenty patients (66.7%) reported a good response with both reduced nocturnal frequency (5.2 +/- 1.16 times versus 2.24 +/- 1.12 times a night, P = 0.000) and urine volume (955.6 +/- 255.9 mL versus 522.8 +/- 210.5 mL, P <0.0001). Two patients (6.7%) had improved nocturnal frequency, and 3 patients (10%) reported no effect at all. After discontinuing the medication for 4 weeks, 13 patients (52%) had improved symptoms compared with baseline and 6 (24%) remained at their post-treatment frequency of nocturia. Urodynamic studies revealed that 15 patients had detrusor instability and 17 had a cystometric capacity of 250 mL or less. No significant difference was found in the success rate relative to the urodynamic results.Desmopressin is safe and effective in the treatment of severe nocturia in patients 65 years old and older.The effect of tube feeding on the hydration of elderly patients.The relationship between dehydration and parotid salivary gland function in young and older healthy adults.Saliva is essential for the maintenance of oral health. The primary constituent of saliva is water and, traditionally, decreased body water homeostasis has been linked with salivary dysfunction. This is consistent with the greater prevalence of dehydration and salivary gland dysfunction among the elderly. However, this association between dehydration and salivary dysfunction has never been tested using objective criteria. The purpose of this study was to determine the effect of body dehydration upon parotid salivary flow rates in young and older healthy adults.Twelve young (20-40 years) and 12 older (60-80 years) healthy subjects abstained from food and beverage intake for 24 h (dehydration) and then underwent intravenous rehydration to replace all lost weight. Unstimulated and stimulated parotid salivary flow rates, weight, hematocrit, hemoglobin, serum sodium, plasma protein, creatinine, serum, and urine osmolality values were assessed at baseline, 24 h, and 1 h after the completion of rehydration.All subjects experienced a significant decrease in weight and increased levels of hematocrit, hemoglobin, plasma protein, and creatinine during dehydration with few age-related differences. Intravenous fluid replacement increased weight and decreased hematocrit, hemoglobin, plasma protein, and creatinine back to baseline values, demonstrating that subjects were metabolically rehydrated. Unstimulated (young and older, p = .0001) and stimulated (young, p > .05; older, p = .03) parotid flow rates decreased during the 24-h dehydration period, yet did not completely return (young and older unstimulated, p < .001; young and older stimulated, p > .05) to baseline values after rehydration.These findings suggest that body dehydration is associated with decreased parotid salivary gland flow rates, and that these changes are generally age-independent in healthy adults. Furthermore, although subjects were metabolically rehydrated, unstimulated salivary flow rates remained significantly lower than baseline levels.Altered water excretion in healthy elderly men.The renal and vasopressin (AVP) response to a standard oral water load (20 ml/kg) was examined in a group of water-replete healthy elderly men (n = 6). Two groups, respectively, of water-replete and water-deprived young healthy volunteers acted as controls. After 2 h, the old group had excreted 41 +/- 2.4% (mean +/- SEM) of the water load compared to 100.7 +/- 8.8% in the water-replete young group and 70 +/- 3.8% in the water-deprived young group (P less than 0.01). Similarly, peak diuresis (7.01 +/- 0.48 ml/kg) and peak free-water clearance (5.7 +/- 0.48 ml/min) as determined from hourly sampling in the old group were delayed and significantly less than both young groups (P less than 0.01) (peak diuresis, young water-replete, 10.86 +/- 0.56 ml/kg, young water-deprived, 10.2 +/- 0.64 ml/kg, peak free-water clearance, young water-replete 8.4 +/- 0.72 ml/min, young water-deprived 9.5 +/- 0.88 ml/min). When these indices were adjusted for reduced creatinine clearance (Ccr) in the elderly, there was no significant difference between the young and old groups. Plasma AVP decreased similarly in all three groups following ingestion of water but there was no significant difference in mean plasma AVP between the young and old subjects throughout the study period. We therefore conclude that ability to excrete excess water promptly is impaired in healthy elderly men. This defect is due, at least in part, to an age-related reduction in glomerular filtration rate.Clinical and laboratory profile information in the prediction of death in elderly patients.A study of prognosis over the first six weeks following admission to a department of geriatric medicine compared the predictive value of a clinical assessment at admission with other more objective parameters such as profile investigations, mental test score and assessment of dehydration and constitutional upset. A total of 739 patients were studied prospectively. The clinical assessment proved to be by far the strongest predictor of six-week mortality. In men the prediction it gave was not improved significantly by addition of the other factors. In women serum albumin, blood urea and assessment of constitutional upset added significantly to the prediction, thought the overall improvement in classification was small and mental test score made a borderline contribution only.Use of foot veins to monitor hydration in the elderly.Experienced consent in geriatrics research: a new method to optimize the capacity to consent in frail elderly subjects.Cognitive and sensory difficulties frequently jeopardize informed consent of frail elderly patients This study is the first to test whether preliminary research experience could enhance geriatric patients' capacity to consent.A step-wise consent procedure was introduced in a study on fluid balance in geriatric patients. Eligible patients providing verbal consent participated in a try-out of a week, during which bioelectrical impedance and weight measurements were performed daily. Afterwards, written informed consent was requested. Comprehension, risk and inconvenience scores (ranges: 0-10) were obtained before and after the try-out by asking ten questions about the study's essentials and by asking for a risk and inconvenience assessment on a ten-points rating scale.Seventy of the 78 eligible subjects started the try-out and 53 (68%) provided written consent. The comprehension score increased from 5.0 (+/- 2.3) to 7.0 (+/- 1.9) following the try-out (P < 0.001). The number of subjects capable of weighing risks and inconveniences increased from 32 to 48 (P < 0.001).Research experience improved the capacity to consent, still enabling an acceptable participation rate. Therefore, experienced consent seems a promising tool to optimize informed consent in frail elderly subjects.Monitoring hypovolemia in healthy elderly subjects by measuring blood pressure response to Valsalva's maneuver.Quantification of hypovolemia by physical examination has limited validity. We explored the use of non-invasive measurement of blood pressure (BP) response to Valsalva's maneuver in monitoring hypovolemia in nine healthy elderly volunteers, recruited from participants of the Nijmegen Annual Four-Days Marches. Heart rate (HR), systolic and diastolic BP, and mean arterial pressure (MAP) response (Finapres) to a Valsalva's maneuver as well as clinical and laboratory assessment of fluid balance were determined 5 minutes before, and 3, 5, and 48 hours after administration of 40 mg furosemide orally. Subjects' (4 males aged 74.2 +/- 3.0 years) weight was 66.1 +/- 9.7 kg, mean BP was 139 +/- 21 over 76 +/- 12 mm Hg. A maximum weight loss of -2.8 +/- 0.9% occurred 5 hours after furosemide administration. Systolic and diastolic BP, HR, clinical assessment scores, and serum creatinine and urea nitrogen did not change during the total study period. Significant changes occurred in Valsalva phase I to phase II systolic BP response (difference +14.2 +/- 11.3 mm Hg, ratio difference -0.09 +/- 0.07 after 5 hours, P < 0.01). Changes after 48 hours did not differ from baseline values. Finapres measurement of Valsalva BP response may be useful in monitoring hypovolemia in the elderly.Monitoring hydration status in elderly veterans.Dehydration is a common water and electrolyte disorder in long-term care residents. Practical methods to detect and monitor dehydration are needed. This study determined whether urine color measured by a urine color chart reflects hydration status. The study employed a repeated measures design with two observations during a 10-hour period. Urine color was compared to the criterion standard of urine specific gravity and osmolality. The sample included 89 participants from two Veterans' Affairs facilities. Urine color was graded on an eight-level color chart. Urine specific gravity and osmolality, serum sodium and osmolality, hematocrit, blood urea nitrogen (BUN), and creatinine were measured using standard laboratory procedures. Significant positive associations existed between urine color and both urine specific gravity and urine osmolality and between urine osmolality and serum sodium and the blood urea nitrogen to creatinine ratio. Although further testing is needed, the color chart has potential as a low-cost technology to monitor dehydration.[The fluid balance in the critically ill patient].In the critically ill patient the hemodynamic management is essential. Usually the hemodynamic status is estimated by the measurement of the intravascular pressure or volume and by computing the fluid balance, while the change in body weight estimates the total body water. The fluid balance is computed by subtracting the fluid output to the input. Although the input (fluids, drugs, infusion.) are well known, the output are difficult to correctly compute, because they depend on several factors such as the body-room temperature, amount of humidity and may change with time. Aim of this study was to prospectively evaluate the accuracy of the fluid balance compared to the body weight measured by a dedicated mattress (Hill-Rom).Fifteen critically ill patients were enrolled (mean age of 63.2+/-19.7 years, body mass index of 24.9+/-3.5 kg/m2) and the measurements were computed every 8 hours. The data were analyzed by the Bland-Altman test.Four-hundred and seventy-two measurements for a mean intensive care stay of 12.3.+/-7.3 days were computed. The Bland-Altamn showed a great inaccuracy, because the agreement (the difference between the 2 methods) was poor with a standard deviation of 1 840 L.Although the fluid balance was not accurate, the only body weight without any intravascular measurement is not helpful for a correct clinical hemodynamic management of the patient.Bioelectrical impedance analysis measurements of total body water and extracellular water in healthy elderly subjects.To address whether: (1) bioelectrical impedance analysis (BIA) can provide precise and accurate estimates of total body water (TBW) and extracellular water (ECW) in healthy elderly subjects, that display age-induced changes in body composition, (2) BIA models are improved by introducing variables related to geometrical body-shape and osmolarity.Cross-validation of available BIA models and models developed in the study.58 healthy elderly subjects (31 women, 27 men, 66.8+/-4.7 y, mean +/- s.d.)BIA at 5, 50 and 100 kHz, 18O labelled water measurements of TBW, Br measurements of ECW, anthropometric variables, plasma osmolarity.Published BIA models for estimating TBW, entail various degrees of bias. Precise models (SEE of the models 0.8 L at 100 kHz, 1.0 L at 50 kHz) involving height2/resistance, weight, gender, circumferences and plasma osmolarity were established with data from 30 subjects chosen at random. Cross-validation of an independent group (n = 28) showed no bias (-1.5+/-3.2 L at 100 kHz, -1.4+/-3.2 L at 50 kHz, P = NS).We conclude that BIA models with increased accuracy and precision for predicting ECW and TBW can be derived in healthy elderly subjects. Repeated measures had a mean difference of 0.2+/-1.2 L.The relation of hydration status to cognitive performance in healthy older adults.Little is known about the relation of hydration status to cognitive performance in older adults, who may be more vulnerable to poor hydration and cognitive impairment. We examined whether hydration status was related to cognitive functioning in 28 healthy community-dwelling older adults. Hierarchical regression models demonstrated that lower hydration status was related to slowed psychomotor processing speed and poorer attention/memory performance, after controlling for demographic variables and blood pressure.Validation of a medical record-based delirium risk assessment.To improve identification of patients at high risk for delirium, this study developed a chart abstraction tool for delirium risk and validated the tool against clinical expert diagnosis of delirium.Prospective cohort study.Tertiary Veterans Affairs hospital in New England.One hundred veterans admitted to the medical service.While admitted, each participant underwent serial assessments for delirium by a clinical expert. Using the four criteria of a validated delirium prediction rule (cognitive impairment, sensory deficit, severe illness, and dehydration), chart review terms were selected for each criterion, and delirium risk was the sum of criteria present (range: 0-4; 4 = worst). After discharge, a nurse blinded to the expert's diagnosis completed the chart tool.The participants were mostly male (94%) and older (mean age 81 ± 7), and 23% developed overall delirium (14% incident). The rate of overall delirium was 11% in participants with zero risk factors, 18% in those with one or two, and 50% in those with three or four (P = .01; c-statistic 0.65, 95% confidence interval (CI) = 0.54-0.76). For incident delirium, the rates were 11%, 13%, and 25%, respectively (P = .53; c-statistic 0.56, 95% CI = 0.42-0.74). Discharge to a rehabilitation center or nursing home increased with increasing delirium risk (0%, 18%, 60%, P = .02).A chart abstraction tool was effective at identifying overall delirium risk but not incident delirium risk. Although the tool cannot replace clinical assessment and diagnosis of delirium, the use of this tool as an educational, clinical, or quality measurement aid warrants additional study.Reduced thirst after water deprivation in healthy elderly men.To determine whether responses to dehydration are altered with age, we investigated the thirst, fluid and electrolyte responses, and hormonal responses to 24 hours of water deprivation in seven healthy active elderly men (67 to 75 years old) and seven healthy young men (20 to 31 years old) who were matched for weight loss during water deprivation. After water deprivation, the older men had greater increases in plasma osmolality, sodium concentration, and vasopressin levels. However, their urinary osmolality was lower and they were less thirsty and drank less after water deprivation, so that their plasma and urine were not diluted to predeprivation levels. Regression analysis indicated increased sensitivity of vasopressin osmoreceptors in the older group, although this difference was not statistically significant. We conclude that after 24 hours of water deprivation, there is a deficit in thirst and water intake in healthy elderly men, as compared with younger men, although vasopressin osmoreceptor responsiveness is maintained or even increased. Our findings also suggest that the well-known deficit in urinary concentrating ability that occurs with age reflects renal causes and not a lack of circulating vasopressin.The effect of xanthines on fluid balance.To determine whether drinks containing caffeine and theophylline cause more fluid loss than equivalent amounts of non-xanthine drinks, a convenience sample of 30 adults between the ages of 57 and 81 was selected. Subjects were picked for 2 groups: those who had developed tolerance to these xanthines and used them freely (the X Group) and those who habitually omitted drinks containing xanthines from their diets (the NO X Group). Both groups consumed approximately 2 liters of fluid daily for 5 days. When overall means were compared by analysis of variance, the two groups did not differ on serum osmolality for Day 5, change in serum osmolality (from Day 0 to Day 5), adjusted I/O ratio, percent weight change from Day 0, or percent weight change from previous day. Analysis of the same variables on a daily basis indicated that the X group was better hydrated on Day 4.Arginine vasopressin and osmolality in the elderly.To evaluate the influence of age on plasma arginine vasopressin (AVP) concentrations and the relationship between plasma AVP and serum osmolality in younger and older subjects, and in the elderly, to assess the effect of gender on plasma AVP concentration and to determine the impact of prostaglandin blockade on renal responsiveness to AVP.Cross-sectional study; randomized, double-blind, crossover, placebo-controlled study.The Renal Laboratory, Royal North Shore Hospital (younger adults) and Clinical Room, St Vincents Hospital (elderly subjects).45 younger adults (35 +/- 9 years), and 41 elderly subjects (29 males, 12 females; 78 +/- 3 years). All subjects were healthy and non-institutionalized. The elderly subjects were screened to exclude significant pathology (clinical assessment, multiple investigations).Blood samples were drawn from all younger and elderly subjects. The elderly subjects were randomly allocated indomethacin or placebo for 1 month. Following a 1 to 2-week washout, the alternative was administered for a further 1 month.Plasma AVP and serum osmolality and plasma AVP, serum, and urine osmolality at baseline were measured on indomethacin and placebo.In the elderly subjects, baseline plasma AVP concentration was significantly higher than in the younger subjects studied (4.7 +/- 0.7 vs 2.1 +/- 0.2 pg/mL respectively; P = 0.0003). Plasma AVP was strongly correlated with serum osmolality in the younger subjects (r = 0.76, P = 0.0001) but not in the elderly cohort (r = -0.18, P = 0.26). No difference was found between the sexes in plasma AVP (P = 0.89), and indomethacin treatment did not alter the plasma AVP/urine osmolality ratio (P = 0.85) in the elderly subjects. In addition, changes in plasma AVP with indomethacin therapy did not correlate with changes in serum osmolality (r = 0.16, P = 0.09).Aging is accompanied by an increase in plasma AVP concentrations. In healthy, elderly subjects, plasma AVP is not dependent on serum osmolality and is not influenced by gender. Indomethacin has no effect on the renal responsiveness to plasma AVP.Evaluating the reliability and utility of cumulative intake and output.During times of scarce resources available for providing patient care, it becomes necessary to validate the effectiveness of standard practices that consume caregivers' time and efforts. Three nurse managers of nursing units serving diverse patient populations studied the effectiveness of continuous intake and output in estimating daily fluid balance. They examined 48-hour records of daily weight and intake and output of 73 patients and correlated the two. Their findings suggest that even when caregiver charting compliance is optimal, daily intake and output recording provides unreliable results. The authors recommend daily weights alone be adopted for all patients who are not experiencing acute renal conditions.Dehydration among long-term care elderly patients with oropharyngeal dysphagia.Long-term care (LTC) residents, especially the orally fed with dysphagia, are prone to dehydration. The clinical consequences of dehydration are critical. The validity of the common laboratory parameters of hydration status is far from being absolute, especially so in the elderly. However, combinations of these indices are more reliable.Assessment of hydration status among elderly LTC residents with oropharyngeal dysphagia.A total of 28 orally fed patients with grade-2 feeding difficulties on the functional outcome swallowing scale (FOSS) and 67 naso-gastric tube (NGT)-fed LTC residents entered the study. The common laboratory, serum and urinary tests were used as indices of hydration status. The results were considered as indicative of dehydration and used as 'markers of dehydration', if they were above the accepted normal values.The mean number of dehydration markers was significantly higher in the FOSS-2 group (3.8 +/- 1.3 vs. 2 +/- 1.4, p = 0.000). About 75% of these FOSS-2 patients had > or =4 dehydration markers versus 18% of the NGT-fed group (p = 0.000). A low urine output (<800 ml/day) was significantly more common in the FOSS-2 group (39 vs. 12%, p = 0.002). Above normal values of blood urea nitrogen (BUN), BUN/serum creatinine ratio (BUN/S(Cr)), urine/serum osmolality ratio (U/S(Osm)), and urine osmolality U(Osm), were significantly more frequent in the dehydration-prone FOSS-2 group. This combination of 4 indices was present in 65% of low urine output patients. In contrast, it was present in only 36% of the higher urine output patients (p = 0.01). Patients with a 'normal' daily urine output (>800 ml/day) also had a significant number (2 +/- 1.5) of positive indices of dehydration.Dehydration was found to be common among orally fed FOSS-2 LTC patients. Surprisingly, probable dehydration, although of a mild degree, was not a rarity among NGT-fed patients either. The combination of 4 parameters, BUN, BUN/S(Cr ), U/S(Osm) and U(Osm), offers reasonable reliability to be used as an indication of dehydration status in daily clinical practice.Hydration status of community-dwelling seniors.Dehydration is the most common fluid or electrolyte disorder among older persons. This study was designed to examine the hydration status of community-dwelling seniors.Blood and urine samples were collected from 67 independently living volunteers (65-93 yrs) who had functional limitations but no condition that contraindicated 10 min of moderate exercise. Forty-six subjects who were not diabetic, had fasted for 12 hours, and had blood glucose levels < or = 115 mg/dL were thus included. Urine and serum samples were analyzed for osmolality (mosm/kg), Na+ (mmol/L) and K+ (mmol/L). Whole blood was analyzed for hemoglobin (Hb, g/dL) and hematocrit (Hct, %) and urine for specific gravity (USG). Means and standard deviations for the current data were compared with normal values.All values were within normal ranges except urine osmolality.While changes associated with aging may predispose an individual to dehydration, functionally limited, independently living older individuals demonstrate normal hydration status following a 12-hr fast. This suggests that dehydration is not solely a function of the aging process, but may be more related to concomitant medical conditions or dependent living.Rapid measurement of total body water to facilitate clinical decision making in hospitalized elderly patients.Bioelectrical impedance analysis (BIA) is a noninvasive rapid and simple bedside technique that can be used to predict total body water (TBW), extracellular water (ECW), and intracellular water (ICW) and identify altered fluid distribution following critical illness.An equivalence study of BIA in 32 hospitalized elderly patients was compared with reference standard dilutional measurements of deuterated water (TBW) and sodium bromide (ECW). The results were compared with anthropometric equations commonly used to predict TBW.There was variability in TBW content among the participating hospitalized elderly patients. This variability was within (+/-5 L) and the percent difference between the standard and BIA was as follows: mean (range) -4.1% (-18.5 to 11.2). BIA reliably predicted TBW and ECW in individual participants, whereas standard prediction equations uniformly over- or underestimated TBW in individuals and whole group population.TBW in hospitalized elderly patients can be estimated noninvasively by bedside BIA. Standardized anthropometric equations have to be used with caution in this population.Is bioelectrical impedance vector analysis of value in the elderly with malnutrition and impaired functionality?The calculation of body composition using bioelectrical impedance analysis is difficult in the elderly because most equations have been found to be inadequate, especially in the malnourished elderly. We therefore evaluated the use of bioelectrical impedance vector analysis in elderly nursing home residents.One hundred twelve nursing home residents were included in the study (34 men, 78 women, age 85.1 y, age range 79.1-91.4 y). Nutritional status was determined by the Mini Nutritional Assessment (MNA), functional status was assessed by handgrip strength, knee extension strength, and Barthel's index, and bioelectrical impedance analysis was performed using Nutriguard M (Data Input, Darmstadt, Germany).Twenty-two nursing home residents were classified as well nourished (MNA I), 80 were considered to be at nutritional risk (MNA II), and 10 were classified as malnourished (MNA III). Handgrip strength, knee extension strength, and Barthel's index were lower in MNA II and MNA III than in MNA I. Phase angle also decreased significantly with the MNA (4.0, 3.8-4.7 degrees; 3.7, 3.3-4.3 degrees; and 2.9, 2.6-3.5 degrees). There was a significant displacement of the mean vector in MNA II and MNA III compared with MNA I.The bioelectrical impedance vector analysis resistance/reactance graph could represent a valuable tool to assess changes in body cell mass and hydration status in elderly nursing home residents.Physician misdiagnosis of dehydration in older adults.Dehydration is a difficult clinical diagnosis in older adults because the physical signs of dehydration are often confusing. The clinical consequences of a diagnosis of dehydration are critical, since dehydration implies increased morbidity and mortality and aggressive rehydration can improve clinical outcome. The diagnosis is a sentinel event for nursing homes, and often is made at transfer to a hospital.To define the accuracy of the clinical diagnosis of dehydration during hospital admission, and to observe persons admitted from long-term care.A total of 102 consecutive medical admissions in persons older than 65 years with a diagnostic coding for dehydration either on admission or during the course of hospitalization over a 3-month period at a university teaching hospital were reviewed. The diagnosis of dehydration was considered confirmed if the calculated serum osmolarity was greater than 295 milliosmols (mOsmol). Subjects were considered to have intravascular volume depletion if the ratio of blood urea nitrogen (BUN) to serum creatinine was greater than 20 or the serum sodium was greater than 145 milligrams per deciliter. Subjects were considered to have hypovolemia if the serum osmolarity was greater than 295 and the BUN/creatinine ratio was greater than 20.Among subjects with a clinical diagnosis of dehydration, only 17% had a serum osmolarity >295 mOsm, and only 11% had a serum sodium greater than 145. A BUN/creatinine ratio greater than 20 was present in 68% of the subjects. Clinicians appear to be using the term dehydration synonymously with intravascular volume depletion. Even so, at least a third of the diagnoses of intravascular volume depletion in older adults were incorrect based on laboratory data.Physicians who diagnose dehydration during hospital admission may be relying more on physical signs than laboratory data. Little change in laboratory markers for hydration status occurs from the time of diagnosis to hospital discharge, suggesting that the clinical diagnosis does not affect fluid management. The data suggest a need for improvement in the differential diagnosis and management of volume changes in older persons.Urine osmolality in the elderly.Investigation was done in the institutionalized elderly in order to know the value of urine osmolality in this population.Cross sectional study was done in the government institutionalized elderly that localized in South Jakarta. By using simple random sampling, 50 elderly people were chosen from all of the residents in this institutionalized elderly aged more than 60 years. They were excluded if they had diabetes mellitus, abnormal cortisol (reference range of morning cortisol, 5-25 ug/dL), potassium less than 3 meq/L, chronic diarrhoe, congestive heart failure, nephrotic syndrome, and cirrhosis of the liver, and also if they were in manitol or diuretic treatment, and not cooperative. All of these data were analyzed with descriptive analysis and comparative T-test of two non-related groups.There were 28 elderly peoples consisted of 13 males and 15 females participated in this study. The mean of the urine osmolality was 581 +/- 174 mosmol/Kg. The mean of the urine osmolality in the female group (657.33 +/- 126.54 mosmol/kg) was significantly higher than in the male group (p = 0.01).The urine osmolality in the elderly is high and the so-called normal value is 407-755 mosmol/Kg. Further study is needed to investigate the lowest urine osmolality value as the diagnostic tool of hyponatremia due to water excretion disorder in the elderly.Response to dehydration in elderly patients in long-term care.Elderly patients in long-term care have a high plasma osmolality (pOSM) and associated increased mortality. In these patients, we examined pOSM, thirst (visual analogue scale, VAS) and arginine vasopressin (AVP) response to 16-hour dehydration and 2-hour rehydration. Twelve patients were randomly divided into two groups (A & B). Group A had their fluid balance monitored for two weeks, group B did not. Single measurements of VAS, pOSM and AVP were conducted on days 0, 7 and 13. Dehydration tests were conducted in both groups at the start of the study (DAY 1), and at the end of the two-week period (DAY 14). There were no significant differences between group A and B, so the results are presented for the two groups combined. There was a significant increase in both pOSM and VAS during dehydration, and a significant fall in both variables during rehydration [F (9,99) = 18.69, p < 0.001, and F(9,99) = 11.25, p < 0.001, respectively]. Plasma AVP did not change significantly during either dehydration or rehydration [F (9,99) = 0.59, p = 0.8]. There were no significant differences in response for any of the three variables between DAY 1 and DAY 14. We conclude that elderly patients in long-term care exhibit changes in thirst and osmolality during dehydration and rehydration, and that these responses are reproducible. The lack of a significant AVP response requires further investigation.Altered water excretion in healthy elderly men.The renal and vasopressin (AVP) response to a standard oral water load (20 ml/kg) was examined in a group of water-replete healthy elderly men (n = 6). Two groups, respectively, of water-replete and water-deprived young healthy volunteers acted as controls. After 2 h, the old group had excreted 41 +/- 2.4% (mean +/- SEM) of the water load compared to 100.7 +/- 8.8% in the water-replete young group and 70 +/- 3.8% in the water-deprived young group (P less than 0.01). Similarly, peak diuresis (7.01 +/- 0.48 ml/kg) and peak free-water clearance (5.7 +/- 0.48 ml/min) as determined from hourly sampling in the old group were delayed and significantly less than both young groups (P less than 0.01) (peak diuresis, young water-replete, 10.86 +/- 0.56 ml/kg, young water-deprived, 10.2 +/- 0.64 ml/kg, peak free-water clearance, young water-replete 8.4 +/- 0.72 ml/min, young water-deprived 9.5 +/- 0.88 ml/min). When these indices were adjusted for reduced creatinine clearance (Ccr) in the elderly, there was no significant difference between the young and old groups. Plasma AVP decreased similarly in all three groups following ingestion of water but there was no significant difference in mean plasma AVP between the young and old subjects throughout the study period. We therefore conclude that ability to excrete excess water promptly is impaired in healthy elderly men. This defect is due, at least in part, to an age-related reduction in glomerular filtration rate.Is whole-body hydration an important consideration in dry eye?To identify if whole-body hydration plays an important role in dry eye (DE). We hypothesized that individuals classified as DE have higher plasma osmolality (Posm), indicating suboptimal hydration, compared with those classified as non-DE.Using a hospital-based observational cross-sectional design, assessment of DE and hydration was performed upon admission in 111 participants (N = 56 males and 55 females; mean ± SD age 77 ± 8 years). Assessments of DE included tear osmolarity (Tosm), the 5-item dry eye questionnaire (DEQ-5), rating of eye dryness using a visual analogue scale (VAS), and noninvasive tear film breakup time (NITBUT). Hydration assessment was performed by measuring Posm using freezing-point depression osmometry.Posm was higher in DE than control (CON), indicating suboptimal hydration when using the 316 mOsm/L Tosm cutoff for DE (mean Posm + 11 mOsm/kg versus CON, P = 0.004, Cohen's effect size [d]) = 0.83) and the more conservative Tosm classification for DE where Tosm >324 and CON <308 mOsm/L (mean Posm + 12 mOsm/kg versus CON, P = 0.006, d = 0.94). Posm was also higher in DE than CON when using composite DE assessments, including Tosm and DEQ-5 (P = 0.021, d = 1.07); Tosm and NITBUT (P = 0.013, d = 1.08); and the VAS and DEQ-5 (P = 0.034, d = 0.58).These are the first published data to show that individuals classified as DE have higher Posm, indicating suboptimal hydration, compared with non-DE. These findings indicate that whole-body hydration is an important consideration in DE.High prevalence of plasma hypertonicity among community-dwelling older adults: results from NHANES III.Recent data suggest that as many as 50% of older adults may have hypertonic plasma, an indicator of cell dehydration that predicts a range of adverse outcomes. To determine if a prevalence of this magnitude could be real, this study used nationally representative data to estimate the prevalence of hypertonicity, and to test for biologically plausible associations between hypertonicity, older age, glucose dysregulation, hemoconcentration, reduced bioelectrical impedance, and water intake.Cross-sectional.Community-dwelling adults (aged 20 to 90 years) who gave blood as part of the Third National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey (N = 14,855).Plasma tonicity was estimated from glucose, sodium, and potassium values. The weighted prevalences of mild (295 to 300 mmol/L) and overt hypertonicity (> or = 300 mmol/L) were estimated by age, sex, race/ethnicity, fasting, and glycemic status. Hyper- and normotonic (285 to 295 mmol/L) groups were compared with respect to elevated blood chemistry values, bioelectrical impedance analysis parameters, as well as total water intake (grams, % Adequate Intake, and grams per kilogram body weight), using multivariable models that adjusted for age, sex, race/ethnicity, and survey design.Mild and overt hypertonicity were observed in 40% and 20% of the sample, respectively. Hypertonicity was positively associated with older age, Hispanic and African-American race, impaired glucose tolerance, diabetes, and hemoconcentration, and inversely associated with bioelectrical impedance analysis parameters. Hypertonicity was associated with greater total water intake in younger adults, but decreased intake in older adults.Clinicians and researchers should be alert to hypertonicity and its causes in older adults.Clinical indicators of dehydration severity in elderly patients.To determine which of the signs and symptoms of dehydration obtainable from patient history and physical examination in the emergency department are most useful in assessing the severity of dehydration in elderly patients.Prospective, correlational study.Two university teaching hospitals.Fifty-five patients aged 60 or older presenting to the emergency department with suspected dehydration were studied.In the emergency department, patients were evaluated by a standardized history and physical examination that included assessment of 38 signs and symptoms commonly attributed to dehydration. The relationships between the presence and intensity of these putative dehydration indicators and an independent rating of dehydration severity based on a comprehensive review of the medical record were evaluated. Also evaluated were the relationships between these dehydration indicators and patient age. Indicators that correlated best with dehydration severity but were unrelated to patient age included: tongue dryness (P less than 0.001), longitudinal tongue furrows (P less than 0.001), dryness of the mucous membranes of the mouth (P less than 0.001), upper body muscle weakness (P less than 0.001), confusion (P less than 0.001), speech difficulty (P less than 0.01), and sunkenness of eyes (P less than 0.01). Other indicators had only weak associations with dehydration severity or were also related to age. Patient thirst was unrelated to dehydration severity.A set of signs and symptoms related to dehydration severity in elderly patients has been identified. These indicators may be more useful for evaluation of dehydration severity in the emergency department than other commonly used indicators.Arginine vasopressin and osmolality in the elderly.To evaluate the influence of age on plasma arginine vasopressin (AVP) concentrations and the relationship between plasma AVP and serum osmolality in younger and older subjects, and in the elderly, to assess the effect of gender on plasma AVP concentration and to determine the impact of prostaglandin blockade on renal responsiveness to AVP.Cross-sectional study; randomized, double-blind, crossover, placebo-controlled study.The Renal Laboratory, Royal North Shore Hospital (younger adults) and Clinical Room, St Vincents Hospital (elderly subjects).45 younger adults (35 +/- 9 years), and 41 elderly subjects (29 males, 12 females; 78 +/- 3 years). All subjects were healthy and non-institutionalized. The elderly subjects were screened to exclude significant pathology (clinical assessment, multiple investigations).Blood samples were drawn from all younger and elderly subjects. The elderly subjects were randomly allocated indomethacin or placebo for 1 month. Following a 1 to 2-week washout, the alternative was administered for a further 1 month.Plasma AVP and serum osmolality and plasma AVP, serum, and urine osmolality at baseline were measured on indomethacin and placebo.In the elderly subjects, baseline plasma AVP concentration was significantly higher than in the younger subjects studied (4.7 +/- 0.7 vs 2.1 +/- 0.2 pg/mL respectively; P = 0.0003). Plasma AVP was strongly correlated with serum osmolality in the younger subjects (r = 0.76, P = 0.0001) but not in the elderly cohort (r = -0.18, P = 0.26). No difference was found between the sexes in plasma AVP (P = 0.89), and indomethacin treatment did not alter the plasma AVP/urine osmolality ratio (P = 0.85) in the elderly subjects. In addition, changes in plasma AVP with indomethacin therapy did not correlate with changes in serum osmolality (r = 0.16, P = 0.09).Aging is accompanied by an increase in plasma AVP concentrations. In healthy, elderly subjects, plasma AVP is not dependent on serum osmolality and is not influenced by gender. Indomethacin has no effect on the renal responsiveness to plasma AVP.Estimation of body composition by bioelectrical impedance in cancer patients.Measurement of body composition is important in the assessment of nutritional status in cancer patients. The purpose of this study was to validate the bioelectrical impedance (BI) method for body composition estimation in 33 elderly cancer patients (mean age 66 +/- 9 years) using the deuterium dilution technique (2H2O) as the reference method. Height2/Resistance (H2/R) correlated significantly with total body water (TBW) computed from 2H2O (r = 0.89, P less than 0.001; s.e.e. = 2.4 l). The prediction equation for TBW improved significantly (P less than 0.001) by addition of H2/R to the predictor variables weight, height, age and sex. We conclude that BI is a useful measure for the assessment of body composition in cancer patients.Dehydration among long-term care elderly patients with oropharyngeal dysphagia.Long-term care (LTC) residents, especially the orally fed with dysphagia, are prone to dehydration. The clinical consequences of dehydration are critical. The validity of the common laboratory parameters of hydration status is far from being absolute, especially so in the elderly. However, combinations of these indices are more reliable.Assessment of hydration status among elderly LTC residents with oropharyngeal dysphagia.A total of 28 orally fed patients with grade-2 feeding difficulties on the functional outcome swallowing scale (FOSS) and 67 naso-gastric tube (NGT)-fed LTC residents entered the study. The common laboratory, serum and urinary tests were used as indices of hydration status. The results were considered as indicative of dehydration and used as 'markers of dehydration', if they were above the accepted normal values.The mean number of dehydration markers was significantly higher in the FOSS-2 group (3.8 +/- 1.3 vs. 2 +/- 1.4, p = 0.000). About 75% of these FOSS-2 patients had > or =4 dehydration markers versus 18% of the NGT-fed group (p = 0.000). A low urine output (<800 ml/day) was significantly more common in the FOSS-2 group (39 vs. 12%, p = 0.002). Above normal values of blood urea nitrogen (BUN), BUN/serum creatinine ratio (BUN/S(Cr)), urine/serum osmolality ratio (U/S(Osm)), and urine osmolality U(Osm), were significantly more frequent in the dehydration-prone FOSS-2 group. This combination of 4 indices was present in 65% of low urine output patients. In contrast, it was present in only 36% of the higher urine output patients (p = 0.01). Patients with a 'normal' daily urine output (>800 ml/day) also had a significant number (2 +/- 1.5) of positive indices of dehydration.Dehydration was found to be common among orally fed FOSS-2 LTC patients. Surprisingly, probable dehydration, although of a mild degree, was not a rarity among NGT-fed patients either. The combination of 4 parameters, BUN, BUN/S(Cr ), U/S(Osm) and U(Osm), offers reasonable reliability to be used as an indication of dehydration status in daily clinical practice.Volaemic assessment of the elderly hyponatraemic patient: reliability of clinical assessment and validation of bioelectrical impedance analysis.Hyponatraemia is the commonest electrolyte disturbance of hospital inpatients. Assessment of volaemic status is an important part of diagnosis and management.To determine reliability of clinical assessment of volaemic state by assessing inter-observer variability of clinical measures of volaemic state. To assess validity of bioelectrical impedance analysis as a tool to measure total body water in elderly hyponatraemic patients.Observational study conducted in a Department of Medicine for the Elderly.Hospital inpatients >65 years old (n=22) with serum sodium concentration <130 mmol/l were included. Two assessors determined volaemic state on two occasions 72 h apart. Level of agreement between observers was determined on each occasion. Total body water estimation was undertaken with bioelectrical impedance analysis and measurement of dilution of deuterium oxide. Correlation between these two measures was then analysed.Cohen's κ for agreement between two observers for overall assessment of volaemic state was 0.59 (P<0.01). Values for agreement between individual clinical markers of volaemic state ranged between 0.16 and 0.45. Pearson correlation coefficient (r) for correlation between estimation of total body water undertaken by bioelectrical impedance analysis and by measurement of dilution of deuterium oxide was 0.69 (P<0.001).There was moderate inter-observer agreement of overall clinical volaemic assessment of elderly hyponatraemic patients. Total body water estimation by bioelectrical impedance analysis correlates well with estimation by measurement of dilution of deuterium oxide, providing a potentially useful tool to improve the management of the elderly hyponatraemic patient.Biochemical and body composition analysis of nocturia in the elderly.Nocturia is a common symptom in the elderly, and various contributing factors have been suggested. Therefore, in order to investigate which factors are strongly related to occurrence of nocturia, we performed a suite of examinations.One hundred eighty volunteers were divided into three groups: a young adult control group (60 healthy persons without nocturia), an elderly control group (60 healthy persons with a low mean frequency of nocturnal urination, i.e., <once per night), and an elderly nocturia group (60 healthy persons with a high mean frequency of nocturnal urination, i.e., more than twice per night). Biochemistry tests, measurement of the osmotic pressure of plasma and urine, and body composition analysis were performed in three groups during the daytime and nighttime. In the elderly control group and the elderly nocturia group, measurement of blood pressure and recording of urinary frequency-volume charts were performed.The features specific to the elderly nocturia group are as follows: (1) a decrease of the nighttime plasma melatonin level, (2) an increase of nighttime plasma catecholamine levels, (3) an increase of daytime and nighttime plasma natriuretic peptide levels, (4) an increase of blood pressure, (5) a decrease of daytime and nighttime urinary osmotic pressure, (6) an increase of total urine volume, and (7) an increase of the edema ratio before sleeping.These results suggest that sleep disturbance, hypertension, and excessive fluid intake are major factors contributing to an increased frequency of nocturnal urination (>twice per night) in the elderly.Reducing hydration-linked events in nursing home residents.The authors used a quasi-experimental treatment and control group design with 49 participants from four nursing homes to test the effectiveness of an 8-week hydration intervention in reducing hydration-linked events (HLEs). A Kaplan Meier survival curve with log rank test was calculated to determine incidence and time to occurrence of a HLE. Incidence of and time to a HLE did not differ between the treatment and control groups over an 8-week period (p > .05). However, treatment group participants were found to be more frail, more cognitively impaired and more at risk for acute confusion than the control group participants. Although there were no statistically significant differences between the groups, it is clinically significant that the frailer, more at-risk participants in the treatment group had a lower incidence of HLEs.Arginine vasopressin and nocturnal polyuria in older adults with frequent nighttime voiding.We determined in older adults whether frequent nighttime voiding is associated with urine overproduction at night or nocturnal polyuria (NP) and whether NP is associated with abnormalities of arginine vasopressin (AVP) blood levels and/or renal responsiveness to AVP.We used a convenience sample of adults 65 years and older in home and general clinical research center settings. A total of 45 participants completed the 3-day general clinical research center stay. We used 7-day voiding diaries to determine which participants had 2 or greater nighttime voids and NP, defined as 35% or greater of 24-hour urine output at night. Abnormalities in AVP release and secretion were determined by water deprivation testing and by twice daily blood AVP measurement.There was a strong positive association between the number of nighttime voids and the proportion of urine produced at night (r = 0.6, p <0.001). There was no association between NP and AVP blood levels or action. Participants with and without NP had similar maximum urine osmolality following water deprivation and exogenous AVP administration (mean 549 mOsm, range 422 to 713 and 547 mOsm, range 353 to 692, respectively).We found no association between NP and AVP abnormalities in this sample of older adults. Study participants had low maximal urine osmolality in response to fluid deprivation and exogenous vasopressin administration irrespective of whether they were identified as having NP.Indices of dehydration among frail nursing home patients: highly variable but stable over time.To determine changes in standard laboratory measures of dehydration among residents of a nursing home care unit (NHCU) over a 6-month period.A prospective cohort analytic study.A 130-bed NHCU in a Department of Veterans Affairs Hospital.Fifteen infirm but stable male residents (mean age 77 years; range (R) 62-93) on one ward of the NHCU.We studied prospectively for 6 months the serum osmolality (osm), serum sodium (Na), blood urea nitrogen/creatinine (BUN/Cr) ratios and weight (wt) for 15 patients of the NHCU. None of the patients was acutely ill during the study period or exhibited clinical signs of dehydration.Mean serum osm at baseline: 291.6 mOsm/kg (R 278 to 300); 3 months: 291.5 mOsm/kg (R 276 to 301); 6 months: 291.3 mOsm/kg (R 283-300) were all similar. Forty percent (6/15) of patients had at least one high normal/elevated reading (> or = 295 mOsm/kg) during the study. Three patients (20%) had readings of > or = 300 mOsm/kg, but none of these patients had either concurrent increased serum Na (> or = 146 mmole/L) or BUN/Cr ratios (> or = 25). Mean serum Na at baseline: 143.0 mmole/L (R 139-148); 3 months: 142.1 mmole/L (R 138-149); 6 months: 142.9 mmole/L (R 137-150) were all similar. Sixty percent (9/15) of the patients maintained normal (nl) serum Na levels throughout the study. The relationship between the change in serum Na and serum osm levels from baseline to 6 months was not significant (r = 0.242). BUN/Cr ratios ranged from 12-34 over the study period with 3 of 15 patients (20%) demonstrating elevated ratios consistently throughout the study without clinical evidence of dehydration. Only two patients had both high nl/elevated serum osm and elevated serum Na, although both had nl BUN/Cr ratios. Neither of these patients was thought by staff to be clinically dehydrated. Analysis of variance (ANOVA) indicated none of the laboratory measures changed significantly over time (serum osm: F(2,28) < 1; Na: F(2,28) < 1; BUN/Cr: F(2,28) < 1). There was no significant change in weight between the baseline and six month readings.These data suggest that in the presence of clinical stability, long-term care residents may have a serum osm in the high normal/elevated range without overt clinical evidence of dehydration, an accompanying elevated Na, or BUN/Cr ratio. This may indicate a different central osm setting for these residents as the serum osm appeared to be stable for each resident over time. These data also suggest that measures of serum osm, Na, and BUN/Cr in the long-term care setting may accurately predict future laboratory values in an individual patient if baseline values are drawn when the patient is not acutely ill.Association of plasma adiponectin levels with cellular hydration state measured using bioelectrical impedance analysis in patients with COPD.It is widely recognized that chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) includes a variety of extra pulmonary complications and comorbidities. Recently, adiponectin was shown to regulate cellular metabolism in humans. Cellular hydration state is affected by a variety of hormonal factors and regulates cellular metabolic state. Therefore, this study was designed to determine whether adiponectin is a possible factor involved in cellular hydration state in COPD.Thirty patients with COPD and 41 age-matched controls participated in the study. Plasma levels of total and high molecular weight (HMW) adiponectin were measured and anthropometry and pulmonary function tests were conducted. Intracellular water (ICW), extracellular water (ECW), and ECW/ICW ratio, which are parameters of cellular hydration state, were measured using bioelectrical impedance analysis.Higher levels of total and HMW adiponectin in plasma were found in patients with COPD compared with levels in controls. A significant inverse correlation was observed between body mass index and plasma levels of total and HMW adiponectin in the control group. However, this significant correlation was not observed in patients with COPD. The plasma levels of total and HMW adiponectin were also not significantly correlated with any pulmonary function parameters in patients with COPD. Regarding the state of cellular hydration, the plasma levels of total adiponectin were inversely correlated with the ECW/ICW ratio and positively with ICW values in patients with COPD. Moreover, closer correlations were found between these parameters and plasma HMW adiponectin levels.The results of the present study suggest a novel association of the plasma adiponectin with cellular hydration state in patients with COPD. Accordingly, lower adiponectin levels may result in cellular shrinkage, leading to metabolic malfunction at a cellular level. Thus, our findings provide new insights regarding the preventive roles of adiponectin in the progression of comorbidities in COPD.A comparison of water turnover in older people in community and institutional settings.Maintaining water balance is essential for health, but environmental factors, pathology and the ageing process can adversely affect water homeostasis.This study examined the relationship between physical dependency and daily water turnover rate in an older population.Daily water turnover (DWT) was estimated, using deuterium oxide ((2)H(2)O) as a tracer for water, over two separate 7-day periods in summer and winter in two older populations. The independent group (N = 22) lived in their own homes and were self-caring. The dependent group (N = 15) lived in institutional care, and were more physically dependent. None of the subjects had significant mental impairment. Total body water (TBW) and DWT were estimated from the equilibration concentration of ingested (2)H(2)O and its subsequent elimination rate.The independent group had a median (range) age of 75(69-88) y, a mean Barthel Index (BI) of 19.8, and a mean Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT) score of 9.8. The dependent group were older (83(72-93) y), with a mean BI of 13 and a mean AMT of 9.3. Average median (range) DWT in the independent group was similar in summer (2.2(1.3-3.6) l.d(-1)) and winter (2.1(1.4-3.6) l.d(-1)), but faster than in the dependent group (1.5(0.9-2.9) and 1.6(1.0-2.8) l.d(-1), respectively) during the same two periods. Median urine output in the independent group was similar in summer (1.7(0.8-3.3) l.d(-1)) and winter (1.7(0.9-3.2) l.d(-1)), but greater than in the dependent group (1.1(0.6-2.7) and 0.9(0.5-1.6) l.d(-1), respectively).These results show that the water turnover rate of many older people is low, and that intake may be affected especially in those with physical disability.Early identification of hypovolemia using total body resistance measurements in long-term care facility residents.Clinical management of fluid imbalance continues to be a major challenge in the long-term care industry. A proactive method of recognizing hypovolemia (reduced total body fluid) in its early stages is greatly needed.The goals of this research were 3-fold: (1) to determine the mean total body resistance(TBR) of an unmatched population of long-term care facility (LTCF) residents and correlate increased levels of TBR with evidence of fluid imbalance; (2) to identify patients at risk for hypovolemia by using TBR measurements as an objective guide; and (3) to suggest nursing practices designed to increase hydration in LTCF residents.Two pairs of electrocardiograph-type electrodes were placed on the right humeral-carpal junction and at the level of the right lateral malleolus of each patient. A 50-kHz signal was introduced to the outer electrode of each pair; the inner electrode detected variation of the resistance to the signal as a function of ionic conduction through the electrolyte content of body fluids. Resistance, reactance, and phase angle were measured.The medical records of patients in 26 LTCFs (17 urban, 9 rural) in north-central and east Texas were reviewed during 2001. The mean age of the 1225 study patients (754 women, 471 men) was 76 years; mean height was 165.8 cm, and mean body weight was 71.9 kg. The mean TBR (right wrist-right ankle) for men and women was 504.81 ohms. Based on this measurement and a measurement of 629 ohms in residents judged to be hypovolemic on the basis of abnormal clinical laboratory data, patients with a wrist-ankle resistance >550 ohms were considered at risk for hypovolemia and possibly clinically significant dehydration. Subsequent measurements of TBR revealed a reduction consistent with levels in the normal range.In these studies, TBR measurements correlated inversely with total body water and fluid compartments. Extracellular fluid compartments were found to be larger in females than in males, reflecting larger cellular mass in males. Total body resistivity was found to be higher in females than in males, which may have implications for body composition metrics. TBR provides a reference for comparison with both clinical and laboratory findings. The ability to identify LTCF residents at risk for hypovolemia, using noninvasive bedside measurements, may offer a definitive guideline for management of adequate fluid balance.Validation of multi-frequency bioelectrical impedance analysis in detecting changes in fluid balance of geriatric patients.Multi-Frequency Bioelectrical Impedance Analysis (MFBIA) is a quick, simple, and inexpensive method to assess body fluid compartments. This study aimed at determining the validity of MFBIA in detecting clinically relevant changes of fluid balance in geriatric patients.A prospective, observational study.The 22-bed Geriatric Department of the University Hospital Nijmegen.Hospitalized patients were eligible if they did not have a pacemaker, were not suffering from terminal illnesses, and did not have psychogeriatric diseases likely to interfere with capacity to consent or comply. During a 16-months period, 218 patients were admitted, of whom 78 patients were eligible and 53 consented to participate.Each subject's fluid balance was diagnosed twice a week as dehydrated, overhydrated, or euvolemic, based on standardized physical examination, laboratory tests, and weight evaluation. Changes in fluid balance were quantified by measuring total body water (TBW) and extracellular fluid (ECF) applying deuterium- and bromide-dilution techniques. Impedance at 1, 5, 50, and 100 kHz and body weight were measured daily. Sensitivity and Guyatt's responsiveness indexes of MFBIA in detecting dehydration and overhydration were determined.In total, 1071 MFBIA measurements were performed, during which 14 transitions from dehydration to euvolemia and 13 transitions from overhydration to euvolemia were monitored. Rehydration of dehydrated patients caused an increase in TBW and ECF of 3.4 +/- 1.8 L and 1.9 +/- 1.9 L, respectively, which resulted in significant decreases in impedance of 133 +/- 67 omega at 1 kHz and 93 +/- 61 omega at 100 kHz (P = .001). Treatment of overhydrated patients caused a TBW and ECF loss of 3.8 +/- 4.2 L and 3.1 +/- 3.8 L, respectively, which resulted in significant increases in impedance of 104 +/- 72 omega at 1 kHz and 81 +/- 68 omega at 100 kHz (P < .001). Sensitivity of a single MFBIA in diagnosing dehydration and overhydration was 14% and 17%, respectively. Responsiveness indexes of weighing and MFBIA for dehydration and overhydration were similar at all frequencies and greater than one.The sensitivity of a single impedance measurement in detecting dehydration and overhydration was low. However, responsiveness of serial measurements to intra-individual changes in fluid balance was good. Therefore, this noninvasive technique may be used in clinical practice to improve monitoring fluid balance in geriatric patients, especially when daily weighing is difficult.Fluid balance in elderly patients following acute stroke.We studied the relationship between plasma osmolality, arginine vasopressin (AVP), and fluid input in patients during the acute phase of a first stroke. Fifteen consecutive patients were studied (median age 79) and their blood sampled on days 0, 1, 2, 3, 7 and 14. Plasma osmolality was related to fluid input over days 0-3 (p = 0.0013) and AVP over 14 days (p less than 0.001). Patients with a poor outcome had higher AVP concentrations (p = 0.02). Those on intravenous fluids received a higher volume (p less than 0.01) and had a lower plasma osmolality (p = 0.04). The results of this preliminary study indicate that a standard regime for fluid input is inappropriate.Prediction of body composition in elderly men over 75 years of age.A comprehensive number of body composition predictions (involving weight, height, skinfold thicknesses, bioelectrical impedance and near-infrared interactance-NIRI) were evaluated against total body water (TBW from isotope dilution), in 23 randomly selected men over 75 years old, and dual-energy X-ray absorptiometry (DXA), in 15 volunteers from this group. Comparisons were made between anthropometric and impedance methods for estimating limb muscle mass (obtained using DXA). Bias and 95% limits of agreement between measured TBW and DXA estimates were -2.1 kg and 3.1 kg, respectively (for fat, 5.4% and 6.1% body weight). Agreement between TBW predictions and reference measurements was remarkably variable, irrespective of whether TBW was predicted from TBW-specific equations or indirectly from estimates of fat or fat-free mass: for predictions using anthropometry, bias ranged from -4.7 kg to 1.6 kg and 95% limits of agreement from bias +/- 3.8 kg to +/- 5.0 kg; using impedance, bias was -8.8 kg to 3.2 kg and 95% limits of agreement were bias +/- 3.6 kg to +/- 7.8 kg; corresponding values for NIRI were -5.3 kg and +/- 5.4 kg. Although some non-age-specific equations appeared valid, age-specific equations generally predicted TBW better. Limb muscle mass (DXA) was predicted better using the segmental impedance method, from indices of limb muscle area (r = 0.76; SEE = 1.9 kg) and volume (r = 0.86; SEE = 1.6 kg), than by anthropometry alone (r = 0.61 and 0.71; SEE = 2.3 kg and 2.1 kg, respectively). In conclusion, some body composition predictions are unacceptable (at least for TBW) in older men, and care is recommended when selecting from these methods or equations. Also, the segmental impedance method is as good as, if not better than, anthropometry alone in predicting limb muscle mass (DXA) in older men.Axillary sweating in clinical assessment of dehydration in ill elderly patients.A pilot study to assess if urine specific gravity and urine colour charts are useful indicators of dehydration in acute stroke patients.The purpose of this pilot study was to examine whether urine specific gravity and urine colour could provide an early warning of dehydration in stroke patients compared with standard blood indicators of hydration status.Dehydration after stroke has been associated with increased blood viscosity, venous thrombo-embolism and stroke mortality at 3-months. Earlier identification of dehydration might allow us to intervene to prevent significant dehydration developing or reduce its duration to improve patient outcomes.We recruited 20 stroke patients in 2007 and measured their urine specific gravity with urine test strips, a refractometer, and urine colour of specimens taken daily on 10 consecutive days and compared with the routine blood urea:creatinine ratios over the same period to look for trends and relationships over time. The agreement between the refractometer, test strips and urine colour were expressed as a percentage with 95% confidence intervals.Nine (45%) of the 20 stroke patients had clinical signs of dehydration and had a significantly higher admission median urea:creatinine ratio (P = 0·02, Mann-Whitney U-test). There were no obvious relationships between urine specific gravity and urine colour with the urea:creatinine ratio. Of the 174 urine samples collected, the refractometer agreed with 70/174 (40%) urine test strip urine specific gravity and 117/174 (67%) urine colour measurements.Our results do not support the use of the urine test strip urine specific gravity as an early indicator of dehydration. Further research is required to develop a practical tool for the early detection of dehydration in stroke patients.Hypernatremia in hospitalized patients.To determine the incidence, clinical characteristics, and outcome for general medical-surgical hospital patients with hypernatremia.A prospective cohort study.A 942-bed urban university hospital.All patients who developed a serum sodium concentration of 150 mmol/L or greater during a 3-month observation period.Daily fluid balance, mental status, and serum and urine electrolytes and osmolality.103 patients were identified. Eighteen patients were hypernatremic on hospital admission, and 85 developed hypernatremia during hospitalization. Patients who developed hypernatremia during hospitalization were younger than patients who developed hypernatremia before hospital admission (mean age +/- SD, 58.9 +/- 19.2 years compared with 76.6 +/- 16.6 years; P < 0.01) but did not differ in age from the patients of the general hospitalized population. Eighty-nine percent of patients who developed hypernatremia during hospitalization had urine concentrating defects, primarily as the result of the use of diuretics or of solute diuresis, whereas only 50% of patients who were hypernatremic on admission could be shown to have concentrating defects (P < 0.01). Fifty-five percent of all hypernatremic patients had increased insensible water losses, and 35% had increased enteral water losses. Eighty-six percent of patients with hospital-acquired hypernatremia lacked free access to water, 74% had enteral water intake of less than 1 L/d, and 94% received less than 1 L of intravenous electrolyte-free water per day during the development of hypernatremia. No supplemental electrolyte-free water was prescribed during the first 24 hours of hypernatremia in 49% of patients. The duration of hypernatremia was shorter in patients who were hypernatremic on admission (median duration, 3 days) than in patients with hospital-acquired hypernatremia (median duration, 5 days; P < 0.05). Mortality was 41% for all patients, but hypernatremia was judged to have contributed to mortality in only 16% of patients.Although the development of hypernatremia before hospital admission occurs primarily in geriatric patients, hospital-acquired hypernatremia was more common in our cohort and had an age distribution similar to that of the general hospitalized population. Hospital-acquired hypernatremia was primarily iatrogenic, resulting from inadequate and inappropriate prescription of fluids to patients with predictably increased water losses and impaired thirst or restricted free water intake or both. Treatment of hypernatremia is often inadequate or delayed. Efforts to manage hypernatremia better and altogether avoid hospital-acquired hypernatremia should focus on both physician education and the development of hospital systems to prevent errors in fluid prescription.[Accumulated fluid balance in patients admitted to the ICU: is it really reliable?].In most of the textbooks, it is considered that the balance calculated after admission and the losses measured and/or estimated is an inexact way of establishing the real balance. Thus daily monitoring of the weight variations is recommended as a single possible alternative. On the other hand, there are few studies that have strictly studied the reliability of the fluid balance calculated. We also have not found any study in middle-long stay critical patients. These circumstances have led us to design an observational prospective study that will allow us to know if the accumulated balance calculated after admission and loses adequately reflect the weight changes in middle-long stay patients. We include 20 patients who were weighed every 48 hours (at least 3 times each one) and we compare the weight changes with the balances calculated. We find that, above all after the 6th day, the accumulated balance calculated adequately reflected the weight changes (mean error/day < 250 ml), regardless of the presence or not of fever, sweat, oral diet, feces or mechanical ventilation. When weight on admission to the ICU was less than 75 kg, the changes in the balance calculated adjusted even more to the weight change, the contrary occurring when the weight was greater than 75 kg. These findings suggest that the accumulated balance calculated represents a valid alternative to daily weighing of the patients and that factors such as body mass and/or surface should be taken into account to reach more exact estimations.Hyponatremia among the institutionalized elderly in 2 long-term care facilities in Taipei.Hyponatremia is common in the institutionalized elderly, and syndrome of inappropriate antidiuretic hormone secretion was deemed the most important etiologic factor. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the prevalence and etiologic factors of hyponatremia among institutionalized elderly and to explore its association with nutritional status.Subjects in 2 private long-term care facilities (LTCFs) participated in this study. Periodic nutritional evaluations, including anthropometric measurements and serial laboratory examinations, were performed every 6 months. When hyponatremia was identified, serum osmolality, serum levels of cortisol, thyrotropin, antidiuretic hormone, urine osmolality, and electrolyte profile were done instantly. Water loading tests were performed for subjects with euvolemic, hypo-osmolar hyponatremia. Nutritional status (i.e. hemoglobin, serum albumin, serum total cholesterol, body mass index [BMI], and mean body weight loss within 6 months) was compared between hyponatremic and normonatremic subjects during hyponatremic episodes and at follow-up (6 months later).In total, 67 (mean age = 77.2 +/- 8.8 years, M/F = 45/22) LTCF residents were enrolled. The prevalence of hyponatremia was 31.3% (21/67) during the 6-month period, and 62.5% of these cases were related to reset osmostat. In addition, BMI was similar between hyponatremic and normonatremic subjects during hyponatremic episodes (19.1 +/- 3.2 vs 20.5 +/- 4.0 kg/m2, p = 0.16), but became significantly lower in hyponatremic subjects 6 months later (18.5 +/- 3.2 vs 20.8 +/- 4.2 kg/m2, p = 0.027). However, the mean body weight loss during the 6-month follow-up was similar (3.0% vs 0.8%, p = 0.25). Furthermore, hemoglobin and serum levels of albumin were similar between groups during hyponatremic episodes and at follow-ups, but serum levels of total cholesterol were significantly lower in hyponatremic subjects on both occasions (166.9 +/- 30.5 vs 190.2 +/- 38.2 mg/dL, p = 0.016 during hyponatremic episodes and 153.6 +/- 29.4 vs 182.8 +/- 35.5 mg/dL, p = 0.003 at follow-up).About a third of LTC-dwelling elderly would experience hyponatremia during the 6-month period, and 62.5% of them were due to reset osmostat. The relationship between hyponatremia and undernutrition deserves further investigation.Body composition by bioelectrical-impedance analysis compared with deuterium dilution and skinfold anthropometry in patients with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.Body composition is an important measure of nutritional status in patients with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD). We generated a regression model for bioelectrical impedance (BI) by using deuterium dilution (2H2O) as a reference method in 32 COPD patients, aged 63 +/- 9 y (mean +/- SD), in stable pulmonary and cardiac condition. Height squared divided by resistance (Ht2/Res) correlated well with total body water (TBW) as measured by 2H2O (r = 0.93, P less than 0.001, SEE = 1.9 L). The best-fitting regression equation to predict TBW comprised Ht2/Res and body weight (r2 = 0.89, SEE = 1.8 L, P less than 0.001). BI-predicted TBW was used to estimate BI-fat-free mass (FFM) that was compared with skinfold-thickness-based FFM predictions (Anthr-FFM). Relative to BI-FFM a significant overestimation of 4.4 +/- 0.8 kg was found by Anthr-FFM. Our results suggest that BI is a useful measure of body composition in patients with severe COPD.Total body water in elderly adults--assessing hydration status by bioelectrical impedance analysis vs urine osmolality.Fluid balance in critically ill patients. Should we really rely on it?The computation of fluid balances (FBs) by subtracting fluid outputs from inputs is a common critical care practice. Limited information exists about the accuracy and consistency of nurse-registered cumulative FBs and regarding the value of suggested corrections for non-measurable losses.From 147 ICU patients, we prospectively evaluated the cumulative FBs and their relationship to changes in body weight (BW). Standardised measurements of BW were performed on admission and discharge. FB charts were accurately reviewed and arithmetic errors corrected. Net cumulative FBs and adjusted cumulative FBs (considering sensible or insensible fluid losses/fever/liquid faeces) were analysed for all patients and 3 subgroups (cardiac-cerebral, septic, and others). Agreement between FBs and BW changes was calculated according to the defined subgroups and confounding variables.Cumulative FBs were inaccurate in 49 cases (33%) with errors ranging from -3606 mL to +2020 mL. The total (average daily) difference between measured BW and FBs (mean ± SD) was 0.185±1.874 kg (0.101±1.020 kg). Correlation (r(2)) and Bland-Altman agreement was poor between BW changes and net cumulative FBs (0.552 and -1.26±5.41 kg) and slightly better between BW changes and adjusted cumulative FBs (0.714 and +0.18±3.68 kg). Standard deviations of the average daily differences between BW changes and FBs were always >1 L. Correction of the net FBs as suggested in the literature were not useful. New multiple regression models only modestly improved correlation.For a large portion of patients nurse-registered cumulative FBs are neither accurate nor do they agree with standardised BW measurements. Patient care and clinical decision-making should be based on more objective techniques.Efficacy of desmopressin in treatment of refractory nocturia in patients older than 65 years.To evaluate the efficacy of desmopressin treatment in patients 65 years old and older with nocturia and to determine whether baseline urodynamic characteristics influenced the outcome of treatment.Patients with nocturia three or more times a night and nocturnal polyuria refractory to medication were treated with oral desmopressin 0.1 mg at bedtime for 4 weeks. Data from urodynamic studies and a voiding diary, nocturnal urine volume, urine specific gravity, serum sodium and potassium level, and quality of life index were measured at baseline, 4 weeks, and 4 weeks after discontinuation of treatment.A total of 30 patients (25 men and 5 women) were enrolled in the study. The mean age was 75.4 +/- 6.6 years. Five patients (16.7%) reported side effects, including hyponatremia in one. Twenty patients (66.7%) reported a good response with both reduced nocturnal frequency (5.2 +/- 1.16 times versus 2.24 +/- 1.12 times a night, P = 0.000) and urine volume (955.6 +/- 255.9 mL versus 522.8 +/- 210.5 mL, P <0.0001). Two patients (6.7%) had improved nocturnal frequency, and 3 patients (10%) reported no effect at all. After discontinuing the medication for 4 weeks, 13 patients (52%) had improved symptoms compared with baseline and 6 (24%) remained at their post-treatment frequency of nocturia. Urodynamic studies revealed that 15 patients had detrusor instability and 17 had a cystometric capacity of 250 mL or less. No significant difference was found in the success rate relative to the urodynamic results.Desmopressin is safe and effective in the treatment of severe nocturia in patients 65 years old and older.The effect of tube feeding on the hydration of elderly patients.The relationship between dehydration and parotid salivary gland function in young and older healthy adults.Saliva is essential for the maintenance of oral health. The primary constituent of saliva is water and, traditionally, decreased body water homeostasis has been linked with salivary dysfunction. This is consistent with the greater prevalence of dehydration and salivary gland dysfunction among the elderly. However, this association between dehydration and salivary dysfunction has never been tested using objective criteria. The purpose of this study was to determine the effect of body dehydration upon parotid salivary flow rates in young and older healthy adults.Twelve young (20-40 years) and 12 older (60-80 years) healthy subjects abstained from food and beverage intake for 24 h (dehydration) and then underwent intravenous rehydration to replace all lost weight. Unstimulated and stimulated parotid salivary flow rates, weight, hematocrit, hemoglobin, serum sodium, plasma protein, creatinine, serum, and urine osmolality values were assessed at baseline, 24 h, and 1 h after the completion of rehydration.All subjects experienced a significant decrease in weight and increased levels of hematocrit, hemoglobin, plasma protein, and creatinine during dehydration with few age-related differences. Intravenous fluid replacement increased weight and decreased hematocrit, hemoglobin, plasma protein, and creatinine back to baseline values, demonstrating that subjects were metabolically rehydrated. Unstimulated (young and older, p = .0001) and stimulated (young, p > .05; older, p = .03) parotid flow rates decreased during the 24-h dehydration period, yet did not completely return (young and older unstimulated, p < .001; young and older stimulated, p > .05) to baseline values after rehydration.These findings suggest that body dehydration is associated with decreased parotid salivary gland flow rates, and that these changes are generally age-independent in healthy adults. Furthermore, although subjects were metabolically rehydrated, unstimulated salivary flow rates remained significantly lower than baseline levels.Physical signs of dehydration in the elderly.Dehydration is a common condition and frequent cause of hospitalization in older people, despite the caregiver's high attention in attempt to avoid its occurrence. In this study, various physical signs were examined as clinical signs of dehydration in elderly.A prospective observational study was conducted in an acute care teaching hospital. Consecutive elderly patients who were admitted to the Department of Medicine were evaluated. Dehydration was defined as a calculated serum osmolality above 295 mOsm/L. The patients diagnosed as dehydrated or not dehydrated were observed for physical signs of dehydration. Data of blood and urine chemistry analysis were also compared between the two groups.A total of 27 elderly patients admitted with acute medical conditions were included in this study. For the physical signs, dry axilla had moderate sensitivity (44%) and excellent specificity (89%) to detect dehydration. Sunken eyes and delayed capillary refill time also showed relatively good specificity (83%). For laboratory data, the mean concentrations of serum sodium of the dehydrated group (146 mEq/L) was significantly higher (p<0.01) than those of the non-dehydrated group (134 mEq/L).Physical signs of dehydration in elderly showed relatively good specificity but poor sensitivity. The evaluation of the axillary moisture could help assess dehydration as well as laboratory data analysis such as serum sodium concentration.Clinical and laboratory profile information in the prediction of death in elderly patients.A study of prognosis over the first six weeks following admission to a department of geriatric medicine compared the predictive value of a clinical assessment at admission with other more objective parameters such as profile investigations, mental test score and assessment of dehydration and constitutional upset. A total of 739 patients were studied prospectively. The clinical assessment proved to be by far the strongest predictor of six-week mortality. In men the prediction it gave was not improved significantly by addition of the other factors. In women serum albumin, blood urea and assessment of constitutional upset added significantly to the prediction, thought the overall improvement in classification was small and mental test score made a borderline contribution only.Use of foot veins to monitor hydration in the elderly.Water balance, hydration status, and fat-free mass hydration in younger and older adults.Older adults are at increased risk of dehydration, yet water balance is understudied in this population.This controlled diet study assessed the effect of age on water input, output, and balance in healthy adults. Hydration status (plasma osmolality and urine specific gravity) and body composition were also measured.Eleven men and 14 women aged 23-46 y and 10 men and 11 women aged 63-81 y were subjects. Water balance was assessed during days 7-10 of three 18-d controlled feeding trials with protein intakes of 0.50, 0.75, and 1.00 g . kg(-1) . d(-1). Total water input included water from the provided foods and beverages, ad libitum intake, and metabolic production. Water output included the losses in urine and stool and the insensible losses from respiration and nonsweating perspiration.Ad libitum water consumption, total water intake, water output through urine, total water output, and net water balance were not different in the older subjects than in the younger subjects. Markers of hydration status were within the range of clinical normalcy for all groups. Total body water (TBW) was not significantly different, fat-free mass (FFM) was significantly lower (P < 0.05), and FFM hydration (TBW:FFM) was significantly higher (P < 0.05) in the older subjects than in the younger subjects. Dietary protein intake did not influence any of these results.These results show that healthy older adults maintain water input, output, and balance comparable to those of younger adults and have no apparent changes in hydration status. The results support that the hydration of FFM is increased in older men and women.Bioelectrical impedance analysis estimation of water compartments in elderly diseased patients: the source study.This study validates, in geriatric patients, bioelectrical impedance analysis (BIA) equations that had been derived to estimate total body water (TBW) and extracellular water (ECW) in healthy elderly subjects.We performed a multicentric trial in six geriatric wards. We studied 169 patients with varying degrees of hydration: dehydrated, euvolemic, and overhydrated. BIA estimates of TBW and of ECW were compared with the measurement of TBW with (18)O dilution and of ECW with bromide (Br) dilution.BIA estimated TBW with a difference of 0.48 +/- 2.3 l (mean +/- SD) (50 kHz; p = .01) and 0.69 +/- 2.2 l (100 kHz; p < 0.001) compared with (18)O dilution. The difference was not affected by the hydration status. Estimates of ECW with BIA were systematically biased compared with Br dilution: 4.6 +/- 3.1 l (equation from Segal and colleagues; p < .001) and 3.4 +/- 2.9 l (equation from Visser and colleagues; p < .001). We propose a new, cross-validated equation. Conclusions. Body water spaces can be estimated accurately in geriatric patients with BIA.Experienced consent in geriatrics research: a new method to optimize the capacity to consent in frail elderly subjects.Cognitive and sensory difficulties frequently jeopardize informed consent of frail elderly patients This study is the first to test whether preliminary research experience could enhance geriatric patients' capacity to consent.A step-wise consent procedure was introduced in a study on fluid balance in geriatric patients. Eligible patients providing verbal consent participated in a try-out of a week, during which bioelectrical impedance and weight measurements were performed daily. Afterwards, written informed consent was requested. Comprehension, risk and inconvenience scores (ranges: 0-10) were obtained before and after the try-out by asking ten questions about the study's essentials and by asking for a risk and inconvenience assessment on a ten-points rating scale.Seventy of the 78 eligible subjects started the try-out and 53 (68%) provided written consent. The comprehension score increased from 5.0 (+/- 2.3) to 7.0 (+/- 1.9) following the try-out (P < 0.001). The number of subjects capable of weighing risks and inconveniences increased from 32 to 48 (P < 0.001).Research experience improved the capacity to consent, still enabling an acceptable participation rate. Therefore, experienced consent seems a promising tool to optimize informed consent in frail elderly subjects.Monitoring hypovolemia in healthy elderly subjects by measuring blood pressure response to Valsalva's maneuver.Quantification of hypovolemia by physical examination has limited validity. We explored the use of non-invasive measurement of blood pressure (BP) response to Valsalva's maneuver in monitoring hypovolemia in nine healthy elderly volunteers, recruited from participants of the Nijmegen Annual Four-Days Marches. Heart rate (HR), systolic and diastolic BP, and mean arterial pressure (MAP) response (Finapres) to a Valsalva's maneuver as well as clinical and laboratory assessment of fluid balance were determined 5 minutes before, and 3, 5, and 48 hours after administration of 40 mg furosemide orally. Subjects' (4 males aged 74.2 +/- 3.0 years) weight was 66.1 +/- 9.7 kg, mean BP was 139 +/- 21 over 76 +/- 12 mm Hg. A maximum weight loss of -2.8 +/- 0.9% occurred 5 hours after furosemide administration. Systolic and diastolic BP, HR, clinical assessment scores, and serum creatinine and urea nitrogen did not change during the total study period. Significant changes occurred in Valsalva phase I to phase II systolic BP response (difference +14.2 +/- 11.3 mm Hg, ratio difference -0.09 +/- 0.07 after 5 hours, P < 0.01). Changes after 48 hours did not differ from baseline values. Finapres measurement of Valsalva BP response may be useful in monitoring hypovolemia in the elderly.Monitoring hydration status in elderly veterans.Dehydration is a common water and electrolyte disorder in long-term care residents. Practical methods to detect and monitor dehydration are needed. This study determined whether urine color measured by a urine color chart reflects hydration status. The study employed a repeated measures design with two observations during a 10-hour period. Urine color was compared to the criterion standard of urine specific gravity and osmolality. The sample included 89 participants from two Veterans' Affairs facilities. Urine color was graded on an eight-level color chart. Urine specific gravity and osmolality, serum sodium and osmolality, hematocrit, blood urea nitrogen (BUN), and creatinine were measured using standard laboratory procedures. Significant positive associations existed between urine color and both urine specific gravity and urine osmolality and between urine osmolality and serum sodium and the blood urea nitrogen to creatinine ratio. Although further testing is needed, the color chart has potential as a low-cost technology to monitor dehydration.[The fluid balance in the critically ill patient].In the critically ill patient the hemodynamic management is essential. Usually the hemodynamic status is estimated by the measurement of the intravascular pressure or volume and by computing the fluid balance, while the change in body weight estimates the total body water. The fluid balance is computed by subtracting the fluid output to the input. Although the input (fluids, drugs, infusion.) are well known, the output are difficult to correctly compute, because they depend on several factors such as the body-room temperature, amount of humidity and may change with time. Aim of this study was to prospectively evaluate the accuracy of the fluid balance compared to the body weight measured by a dedicated mattress (Hill-Rom).Fifteen critically ill patients were enrolled (mean age of 63.2+/-19.7 years, body mass index of 24.9+/-3.5 kg/m2) and the measurements were computed every 8 hours. The data were analyzed by the Bland-Altman test.Four-hundred and seventy-two measurements for a mean intensive care stay of 12.3.+/-7.3 days were computed. The Bland-Altamn showed a great inaccuracy, because the agreement (the difference between the 2 methods) was poor with a standard deviation of 1 840 L.Although the fluid balance was not accurate, the only body weight without any intravascular measurement is not helpful for a correct clinical hemodynamic management of the patient.Bioelectrical impedance analysis measurements of total body water and extracellular water in healthy elderly subjects.To address whether: (1) bioelectrical impedance analysis (BIA) can provide precise and accurate estimates of total body water (TBW) and extracellular water (ECW) in healthy elderly subjects, that display age-induced changes in body composition, (2) BIA models are improved by introducing variables related to geometrical body-shape and osmolarity.Cross-validation of available BIA models and models developed in the study.58 healthy elderly subjects (31 women, 27 men, 66.8+/-4.7 y, mean +/- s.d.)BIA at 5, 50 and 100 kHz, 18O labelled water measurements of TBW, Br measurements of ECW, anthropometric variables, plasma osmolarity.Published BIA models for estimating TBW, entail various degrees of bias. Precise models (SEE of the models 0.8 L at 100 kHz, 1.0 L at 50 kHz) involving height2/resistance, weight, gender, circumferences and plasma osmolarity were established with data from 30 subjects chosen at random. Cross-validation of an independent group (n = 28) showed no bias (-1.5+/-3.2 L at 100 kHz, -1.4+/-3.2 L at 50 kHz, P = NS).We conclude that BIA models with increased accuracy and precision for predicting ECW and TBW can be derived in healthy elderly subjects. Repeated measures had a mean difference of 0.2+/-1.2 L.The relation of hydration status to cognitive performance in healthy older adults.Little is known about the relation of hydration status to cognitive performance in older adults, who may be more vulnerable to poor hydration and cognitive impairment. We examined whether hydration status was related to cognitive functioning in 28 healthy community-dwelling older adults. Hierarchical regression models demonstrated that lower hydration status was related to slowed psychomotor processing speed and poorer attention/memory performance, after controlling for demographic variables and blood pressure.Validation of a medical record-based delirium risk assessment.To improve identification of patients at high risk for delirium, this study developed a chart abstraction tool for delirium risk and validated the tool against clinical expert diagnosis of delirium.Prospective cohort study.Tertiary Veterans Affairs hospital in New England.One hundred veterans admitted to the medical service.While admitted, each participant underwent serial assessments for delirium by a clinical expert. Using the four criteria of a validated delirium prediction rule (cognitive impairment, sensory deficit, severe illness, and dehydration), chart review terms were selected for each criterion, and delirium risk was the sum of criteria present (range: 0-4; 4 = worst). After discharge, a nurse blinded to the expert's diagnosis completed the chart tool.The participants were mostly male (94%) and older (mean age 81 ± 7), and 23% developed overall delirium (14% incident). The rate of overall delirium was 11% in participants with zero risk factors, 18% in those with one or two, and 50% in those with three or four (P = .01; c-statistic 0.65, 95% confidence interval (CI) = 0.54-0.76). For incident delirium, the rates were 11%, 13%, and 25%, respectively (P = .53; c-statistic 0.56, 95% CI = 0.42-0.74). Discharge to a rehabilitation center or nursing home increased with increasing delirium risk (0%, 18%, 60%, P = .02).A chart abstraction tool was effective at identifying overall delirium risk but not incident delirium risk. Although the tool cannot replace clinical assessment and diagnosis of delirium, the use of this tool as an educational, clinical, or quality measurement aid warrants additional study.Bioelectrical impedance analysis and other hydration parameters as risk factors for delirium in rural nursing home residents.The study investigators conducted a vigorous screening protocol for delirium in rural long-term care (LTC) facilities for a period of 28 days focusing on Bioelectrical Impedance Analysis (BIA) and other hydration parameters as risk factors.A two-stage cluster sampling procedure was used to randomly select participants (n = 313) from 13 LTC facilities located in southeastern Iowa, stratified on facility bed size. BIA was used to estimate intracellular water (ICW), extracellular water (ECW), and total body water (TBW) on four occasions--baseline and follow-up days 7, 14, and 28. Volume estimates were calculated as a percent of body weight (%WT). Serum electrolytes and hematology were also measured. Delirium was measured with four strict criteria: a NEECHAM Confusion Scale score < 25, Vigilance "A" score > 2, a Mini-Mental Status Examination < baseline, and a positive Confusion Assessment Method score.There were n = 69 delirium cases (22.0%). Blood urea nitrogen/creatinine ratios greater than 21:1 (odds ratio = 1.76, 95% confidence interval 1.02-3.06). No significant risk for delirium was associated with ICW, ECW, or TBW as a percent of body weight.Some changes were observed with a slight decrease in ICW between day 7 and day 14 of follow-up that tended to follow an increase in delirium events, but in general the BIA measures did not predict delirium events.Hydration and acute confusion in long-term care residents.Although it is generally appropriate for a healthy adult to consume 2000 to 2500 ml per day, the literature does not address evaluating any standard. The objective here was to develop a weight-based hydration management intervention and evaluate the impact of this on the incidence of acute confusion (AC) using an N = 98. The intervention consisted of a fluid intake goal based on 100 ml per kg for the first 10 kg, 50 ml/kg for the next 10 kg, and 15 ml for the remaining body weight. The treatment group received instruction and assistance on the fluid goal and the control group received routine care. Measurements included serum electrolytes, bioimpedance analysis, urinalysis, Mini-Mental State Exam, and the NEECHAM. There was no difference in the incidence of AC between treatment and controls, but those individuals with > or = 90% compliance demonstrated higher ECF volumes and also lower urine leukocyte counts.Reduced thirst after water deprivation in healthy elderly men.To determine whether responses to dehydration are altered with age, we investigated the thirst, fluid and electrolyte responses, and hormonal responses to 24 hours of water deprivation in seven healthy active elderly men (67 to 75 years old) and seven healthy young men (20 to 31 years old) who were matched for weight loss during water deprivation. After water deprivation, the older men had greater increases in plasma osmolality, sodium concentration, and vasopressin levels. However, their urinary osmolality was lower and they were less thirsty and drank less after water deprivation, so that their plasma and urine were not diluted to predeprivation levels. Regression analysis indicated increased sensitivity of vasopressin osmoreceptors in the older group, although this difference was not statistically significant. We conclude that after 24 hours of water deprivation, there is a deficit in thirst and water intake in healthy elderly men, as compared with younger men, although vasopressin osmoreceptor responsiveness is maintained or even increased. Our findings also suggest that the well-known deficit in urinary concentrating ability that occurs with age reflects renal causes and not a lack of circulating vasopressin.The effect of xanthines on fluid balance.To determine whether drinks containing caffeine and theophylline cause more fluid loss than equivalent amounts of non-xanthine drinks, a convenience sample of 30 adults between the ages of 57 and 81 was selected. Subjects were picked for 2 groups: those who had developed tolerance to these xanthines and used them freely (the X Group) and those who habitually omitted drinks containing xanthines from their diets (the NO X Group). Both groups consumed approximately 2 liters of fluid daily for 5 days. When overall means were compared by analysis of variance, the two groups did not differ on serum osmolality for Day 5, change in serum osmolality (from Day 0 to Day 5), adjusted I/O ratio, percent weight change from Day 0, or percent weight change from previous day. Analysis of the same variables on a daily basis indicated that the X group was better hydrated on Day 4.Evaluating the reliability and utility of cumulative intake and output.During times of scarce resources available for providing patient care, it becomes necessary to validate the effectiveness of standard practices that consume caregivers' time and efforts. Three nurse managers of nursing units serving diverse patient populations studied the effectiveness of continuous intake and output in estimating daily fluid balance. They examined 48-hour records of daily weight and intake and output of 73 patients and correlated the two. Their findings suggest that even when caregiver charting compliance is optimal, daily intake and output recording provides unreliable results. The authors recommend daily weights alone be adopted for all patients who are not experiencing acute renal conditions.Clinical presentation of hypernatremia in elderly patients: a case control study.To assess early clinical signs and their prognostic value in elderly patients with hypernatremia.Prospective, case control study of 150 patients with hypernatremia matched to 300 controls.Multicenter study including seven short- and long-term geriatric care facilities.Clinical assessment of hydration status at bedside, such as abnormal skin turgor or dry oral mucosa.30-day mortality rate and clinical indicators (assessed at the peak of natremia) associated with mortality.Patients and controls were comparable in terms of drugs and underlying diseases, except for history of dementia, which was more frequent in patients than in controls. Patients were significantly more likely than controls to have low blood pressure, tachycardia, dry oral mucosa, abnormal skin turgor, and recent change of consciousness. Only three clinical findings were found in at least 60% of patients with hypernatremia: orthostatic blood pressure and abnormal subclavicular and forearm skin turgor. The latter two signs were significantly more frequent in patients with hypernatremia. Four other signs (tachycardia, abnormal subclavicular skin turgor, dry oral mucosa, and recent change of consciousness) had a specificity of greater than 79%. Using logistic regression, four signs were significantly and independently associated with hypernatremia: abnormal subclavicular and thigh skin turgor, dry oral mucosa, and recent change of consciousness. The mortality rate was 41.5% and was significantly higher in patients with hypernatremia. The status of consciousness when hypernatremia was diagnosed was the single prognostic indicator associated with mortality (odds ratio=2.3, 95% confidence interval=1.01-5.2).Most of the classical signs of dehydration are irregularly present in patients with hypernatremia. Caregivers should carefully screen any variations in consciousness, because they may reveal severe hypernatremia.Hydration status of community-dwelling seniors.Dehydration is the most common fluid or electrolyte disorder among older persons. This study was designed to examine the hydration status of community-dwelling seniors.Blood and urine samples were collected from 67 independently living volunteers (65-93 yrs) who had functional limitations but no condition that contraindicated 10 min of moderate exercise. Forty-six subjects who were not diabetic, had fasted for 12 hours, and had blood glucose levels < or = 115 mg/dL were thus included. Urine and serum samples were analyzed for osmolality (mosm/kg), Na+ (mmol/L) and K+ (mmol/L). Whole blood was analyzed for hemoglobin (Hb, g/dL) and hematocrit (Hct, %) and urine for specific gravity (USG). Means and standard deviations for the current data were compared with normal values.All values were within normal ranges except urine osmolality.While changes associated with aging may predispose an individual to dehydration, functionally limited, independently living older individuals demonstrate normal hydration status following a 12-hr fast. This suggests that dehydration is not solely a function of the aging process, but may be more related to concomitant medical conditions or dependent living.Rapid measurement of total body water to facilitate clinical decision making in hospitalized elderly patients.Bioelectrical impedance analysis (BIA) is a noninvasive rapid and simple bedside technique that can be used to predict total body water (TBW), extracellular water (ECW), and intracellular water (ICW) and identify altered fluid distribution following critical illness.An equivalence study of BIA in 32 hospitalized elderly patients was compared with reference standard dilutional measurements of deuterated water (TBW) and sodium bromide (ECW). The results were compared with anthropometric equations commonly used to predict TBW.There was variability in TBW content among the participating hospitalized elderly patients. This variability was within (+/-5 L) and the percent difference between the standard and BIA was as follows: mean (range) -4.1% (-18.5 to 11.2). BIA reliably predicted TBW and ECW in individual participants, whereas standard prediction equations uniformly over- or underestimated TBW in individuals and whole group population.TBW in hospitalized elderly patients can be estimated noninvasively by bedside BIA. Standardized anthropometric equations have to be used with caution in this population.The measurement of axillary moisture for the assessment of dehydration among older patients: a pilot study.Dry axilla can sometimes be found among dehydrated older patients. In this study, we measured the axillary moisture and assessed it as possible marker for dehydration.Twenty-nine older patients admitted with acute medical conditions participated in this study. Dehydration was diagnosed by the calculated serum osmolality of greater than 295 mOsm/L. The moisture of axilla was measured by a skin moisture impedance meter which was applied at the center of axilla of patients.11 patients (7 males and 4 females) were diagnosed as dehydrated and 18 patients (10 males and 8 females) were diagnosed as non-dehydrated. The mean axillary moisture (33%) in the dehydrated group was significantly lower than that (42%) in the non-dehydrated group (p<0.05). The axillary moisture ≥50% showed the sensitivity of 88%. The axillary moisture <30% showed the specificity of 91%. Use of a single cutoff value of 40% moisture produced the sensitivity of 59% and the specificity of 9%. As for the physical signs, dry axilla had also moderate sensitivity and excellent specificity to detect dehydration.The measurement of the axillary moisture could help assess dehydration. Dehydration could be ruled out when the axillary moisture ≥50%, while it could be ruled-in when the axillary moisture is <30%.Tonicity balance in patients with hypernatremia acquired in the intensive care unit.Hypernatremia is a serious electrolyte disturbance and an independent risk factor for mortality in critically ill patients. In many cases, hypernatremia is an iatrogenic problem that develops in the intensive care unit (ICU).Case series.45 patients were studied in a medical ICU. For inclusion in the study, patients needed to show an increase in serum sodium concentration to greater than 149 mEq/L from an initial concentration of less than 146 mEq/L.Solute balance, fluid balance, and both. Causes of hypernatremia.The daily mass balance of sodium, potassium, and water over 1- to 3-day intervals was measured while serum sodium levels were increasing.During the study period, 69 of 981 patients (7%) acquired hypernatremia after admission to the ICU. Of these, 45 had sufficient data for evaluation. Maximum serum sodium levels were 150 to 164 mEq/L. The average duration of hypernatremia was 2 days (range, 1 to 10 days), with an average onset on day 5.9 +/- 4.3 of the ICU stay. Patients were classified as having a positive solute balance (n = 17; 38%), negative fluid balance (n = 20; 44%), or both (n = 8; 18%). The most important extrarenal factors contributing to hypernatremia were fever (45%) and diarrhea (18%). Polyuria was observed in 38% of patients and 35% had acute renal failure. Hypertonic solutions were administered to 27% of patients.Retrospective analysis; lack of daily measurement of body weight.ICU-acquired hypernatremia is associated with multiple factors associated with negative fluid and positive solute balance.Is bioelectrical impedance vector analysis of value in the elderly with malnutrition and impaired functionality?The calculation of body composition using bioelectrical impedance analysis is difficult in the elderly because most equations have been found to be inadequate, especially in the malnourished elderly. We therefore evaluated the use of bioelectrical impedance vector analysis in elderly nursing home residents.One hundred twelve nursing home residents were included in the study (34 men, 78 women, age 85.1 y, age range 79.1-91.4 y). Nutritional status was determined by the Mini Nutritional Assessment (MNA), functional status was assessed by handgrip strength, knee extension strength, and Barthel's index, and bioelectrical impedance analysis was performed using Nutriguard M (Data Input, Darmstadt, Germany).Twenty-two nursing home residents were classified as well nourished (MNA I), 80 were considered to be at nutritional risk (MNA II), and 10 were classified as malnourished (MNA III). Handgrip strength, knee extension strength, and Barthel's index were lower in MNA II and MNA III than in MNA I. Phase angle also decreased significantly with the MNA (4.0, 3.8-4.7 degrees; 3.7, 3.3-4.3 degrees; and 2.9, 2.6-3.5 degrees). There was a significant displacement of the mean vector in MNA II and MNA III compared with MNA I.The bioelectrical impedance vector analysis resistance/reactance graph could represent a valuable tool to assess changes in body cell mass and hydration status in elderly nursing home residents.Physician misdiagnosis of dehydration in older adults.Dehydration is a difficult clinical diagnosis in older adults because the physical signs of dehydration are often confusing. The clinical consequences of a diagnosis of dehydration are critical, since dehydration implies increased morbidity and mortality and aggressive rehydration can improve clinical outcome. The diagnosis is a sentinel event for nursing homes, and often is made at transfer to a hospital.To define the accuracy of the clinical diagnosis of dehydration during hospital admission, and to observe persons admitted from long-term care.A total of 102 consecutive medical admissions in persons older than 65 years with a diagnostic coding for dehydration either on admission or during the course of hospitalization over a 3-month period at a university teaching hospital were reviewed. The diagnosis of dehydration was considered confirmed if the calculated serum osmolarity was greater than 295 milliosmols (mOsmol). Subjects were considered to have intravascular volume depletion if the ratio of blood urea nitrogen (BUN) to serum creatinine was greater than 20 or the serum sodium was greater than 145 milligrams per deciliter. Subjects were considered to have hypovolemia if the serum osmolarity was greater than 295 and the BUN/creatinine ratio was greater than 20.Among subjects with a clinical diagnosis of dehydration, only 17% had a serum osmolarity >295 mOsm, and only 11% had a serum sodium greater than 145. A BUN/creatinine ratio greater than 20 was present in 68% of the subjects. Clinicians appear to be using the term dehydration synonymously with intravascular volume depletion. Even so, at least a third of the diagnoses of intravascular volume depletion in older adults were incorrect based on laboratory data.Physicians who diagnose dehydration during hospital admission may be relying more on physical signs than laboratory data. Little change in laboratory markers for hydration status occurs from the time of diagnosis to hospital discharge, suggesting that the clinical diagnosis does not affect fluid management. The data suggest a need for improvement in the differential diagnosis and management of volume changes in older persons.Urine osmolality in the elderly.Investigation was done in the institutionalized elderly in order to know the value of urine osmolality in this population.Cross sectional study was done in the government institutionalized elderly that localized in South Jakarta. By using simple random sampling, 50 elderly people were chosen from all of the residents in this institutionalized elderly aged more than 60 years. They were excluded if they had diabetes mellitus, abnormal cortisol (reference range of morning cortisol, 5-25 ug/dL), potassium less than 3 meq/L, chronic diarrhoe, congestive heart failure, nephrotic syndrome, and cirrhosis of the liver, and also if they were in manitol or diuretic treatment, and not cooperative. All of these data were analyzed with descriptive analysis and comparative T-test of two non-related groups.There were 28 elderly peoples consisted of 13 males and 15 females participated in this study. The mean of the urine osmolality was 581 +/- 174 mosmol/Kg. The mean of the urine osmolality in the female group (657.33 +/- 126.54 mosmol/kg) was significantly higher than in the male group (p = 0.01).The urine osmolality in the elderly is high and the so-called normal value is 407-755 mosmol/Kg. Further study is needed to investigate the lowest urine osmolality value as the diagnostic tool of hyponatremia due to water excretion disorder in the elderly.Sensitivity and specificity of clinical signs for assessment of dehydration in endurance athletes.To investigate the diagnostic accuracy of commonly used signs of dehydration in marathon runners.The diagnostic accuracy of 5 clinical signs/symptoms thought to indicate dehydration (altered skin turgor, dry oral mucous membranes, sunken eyes, an inability to spit and the sensation of thirst) was assessed by comparing the presence of these markers with the criterion standard of body weight change over a marathon footrace.2006 Auckland Marathon.606 competitors in the full marathon.Body weight was measured before and immediately after the marathon. The 5 clinical signs/symptoms were assessed immediately after the marathon.Diagnostic accuracy of clinical signs/symptoms to detect dehydration greater than 3% of body weight. Results 606 complete data sets were obtained. 3 clinical signs were associated with greater percentage weight loss: sunken eyes (mean percentage weight loss with symptom 2.6% (standard deviation 1.5), without 2.3% (1.5)); decreased skin turgor (with 3.0% (1.4), without 2.3% (1.5)) and the sensation of thirst (with 2.5% (1.5), without 2.3% (1.5)). The ability to spit and dry oral mucous membranes were unrelated to percentage weight loss. No signs/symptoms showed acceptably high validity for detecting a weight loss equal to or greater than 3% of body weight.The 5 parameters (decreased skin turgor, sensation of thirst, sunken eyes, inability to spit and dry mucous membranes) tested in this study did not precisely identify runners with total weight loss >3% at the end of a marathon.Response to dehydration in elderly patients in long-term care.Elderly patients in long-term care have a high plasma osmolality (pOSM) and associated increased mortality. In these patients, we examined pOSM, thirst (visual analogue scale, VAS) and arginine vasopressin (AVP) response to 16-hour dehydration and 2-hour rehydration. Twelve patients were randomly divided into two groups (A & B). Group A had their fluid balance monitored for two weeks, group B did not. Single measurements of VAS, pOSM and AVP were conducted on days 0, 7 and 13. Dehydration tests were conducted in both groups at the start of the study (DAY 1), and at the end of the two-week period (DAY 14). There were no significant differences between group A and B, so the results are presented for the two groups combined. There was a significant increase in both pOSM and VAS during dehydration, and a significant fall in both variables during rehydration [F (9,99) = 18.69, p < 0.001, and F(9,99) = 11.25, p < 0.001, respectively]. Plasma AVP did not change significantly during either dehydration or rehydration [F (9,99) = 0.59, p = 0.8]. There were no significant differences in response for any of the three variables between DAY 1 and DAY 14. We conclude that elderly patients in long-term care exhibit changes in thirst and osmolality during dehydration and rehydration, and that these responses are reproducible. The lack of a significant AVP response requires further investigation.Altered water excretion in healthy elderly men.The renal and vasopressin (AVP) response to a standard oral water load (20 ml/kg) was examined in a group of water-replete healthy elderly men (n = 6). Two groups, respectively, of water-replete and water-deprived young healthy volunteers acted as controls. After 2 h, the old group had excreted 41 +/- 2.4% (mean +/- SEM) of the water load compared to 100.7 +/- 8.8% in the water-replete young group and 70 +/- 3.8% in the water-deprived young group (P less than 0.01). Similarly, peak diuresis (7.01 +/- 0.48 ml/kg) and peak free-water clearance (5.7 +/- 0.48 ml/min) as determined from hourly sampling in the old group were delayed and significantly less than both young groups (P less than 0.01) (peak diuresis, young water-replete, 10.86 +/- 0.56 ml/kg, young water-deprived, 10.2 +/- 0.64 ml/kg, peak free-water clearance, young water-replete 8.4 +/- 0.72 ml/min, young water-deprived 9.5 +/- 0.88 ml/min). When these indices were adjusted for reduced creatinine clearance (Ccr) in the elderly, there was no significant difference between the young and old groups. Plasma AVP decreased similarly in all three groups following ingestion of water but there was no significant difference in mean plasma AVP between the young and old subjects throughout the study period. We therefore conclude that ability to excrete excess water promptly is impaired in healthy elderly men. This defect is due, at least in part, to an age-related reduction in glomerular filtration rate.Is whole-body hydration an important consideration in dry eye?To identify if whole-body hydration plays an important role in dry eye (DE). We hypothesized that individuals classified as DE have higher plasma osmolality (Posm), indicating suboptimal hydration, compared with those classified as non-DE.Using a hospital-based observational cross-sectional design, assessment of DE and hydration was performed upon admission in 111 participants (N = 56 males and 55 females; mean ± SD age 77 ± 8 years). Assessments of DE included tear osmolarity (Tosm), the 5-item dry eye questionnaire (DEQ-5), rating of eye dryness using a visual analogue scale (VAS), and noninvasive tear film breakup time (NITBUT). Hydration assessment was performed by measuring Posm using freezing-point depression osmometry.Posm was higher in DE than control (CON), indicating suboptimal hydration when using the 316 mOsm/L Tosm cutoff for DE (mean Posm + 11 mOsm/kg versus CON, P = 0.004, Cohen's effect size [d]) = 0.83) and the more conservative Tosm classification for DE where Tosm >324 and CON <308 mOsm/L (mean Posm + 12 mOsm/kg versus CON, P = 0.006, d = 0.94). Posm was also higher in DE than CON when using composite DE assessments, including Tosm and DEQ-5 (P = 0.021, d = 1.07); Tosm and NITBUT (P = 0.013, d = 1.08); and the VAS and DEQ-5 (P = 0.034, d = 0.58).These are the first published data to show that individuals classified as DE have higher Posm, indicating suboptimal hydration, compared with non-DE. These findings indicate that whole-body hydration is an important consideration in DE.High prevalence of plasma hypertonicity among community-dwelling older adults: results from NHANES III.Recent data suggest that as many as 50% of older adults may have hypertonic plasma, an indicator of cell dehydration that predicts a range of adverse outcomes. To determine if a prevalence of this magnitude could be real, this study used nationally representative data to estimate the prevalence of hypertonicity, and to test for biologically plausible associations between hypertonicity, older age, glucose dysregulation, hemoconcentration, reduced bioelectrical impedance, and water intake.Cross-sectional.Community-dwelling adults (aged 20 to 90 years) who gave blood as part of the Third National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey (N = 14,855).Plasma tonicity was estimated from glucose, sodium, and potassium values. The weighted prevalences of mild (295 to 300 mmol/L) and overt hypertonicity (> or = 300 mmol/L) were estimated by age, sex, race/ethnicity, fasting, and glycemic status. Hyper- and normotonic (285 to 295 mmol/L) groups were compared with respect to elevated blood chemistry values, bioelectrical impedance analysis parameters, as well as total water intake (grams, % Adequate Intake, and grams per kilogram body weight), using multivariable models that adjusted for age, sex, race/ethnicity, and survey design.Mild and overt hypertonicity were observed in 40% and 20% of the sample, respectively. Hypertonicity was positively associated with older age, Hispanic and African-American race, impaired glucose tolerance, diabetes, and hemoconcentration, and inversely associated with bioelectrical impedance analysis parameters. Hypertonicity was associated with greater total water intake in younger adults, but decreased intake in older adults.Clinicians and researchers should be alert to hypertonicity and its causes in older adults.Clinical indicators of dehydration severity in elderly patients.To determine which of the signs and symptoms of dehydration obtainable from patient history and physical examination in the emergency department are most useful in assessing the severity of dehydration in elderly patients.Prospective, correlational study.Two university teaching hospitals.Fifty-five patients aged 60 or older presenting to the emergency department with suspected dehydration were studied.In the emergency department, patients were evaluated by a standardized history and physical examination that included assessment of 38 signs and symptoms commonly attributed to dehydration. The relationships between the presence and intensity of these putative dehydration indicators and an independent rating of dehydration severity based on a comprehensive review of the medical record were evaluated. Also evaluated were the relationships between these dehydration indicators and patient age. Indicators that correlated best with dehydration severity but were unrelated to patient age included: tongue dryness (P less than 0.001), longitudinal tongue furrows (P less than 0.001), dryness of the mucous membranes of the mouth (P less than 0.001), upper body muscle weakness (P less than 0.001), confusion (P less than 0.001), speech difficulty (P less than 0.01), and sunkenness of eyes (P less than 0.01). Other indicators had only weak associations with dehydration severity or were also related to age. Patient thirst was unrelated to dehydration severity.A set of signs and symptoms related to dehydration severity in elderly patients has been identified. These indicators may be more useful for evaluation of dehydration severity in the emergency department than other commonly used indicators.Arginine vasopressin and osmolality in the elderly.To evaluate the influence of age on plasma arginine vasopressin (AVP) concentrations and the relationship between plasma AVP and serum osmolality in younger and older subjects, and in the elderly, to assess the effect of gender on plasma AVP concentration and to determine the impact of prostaglandin blockade on renal responsiveness to AVP.Cross-sectional study; randomized, double-blind, crossover, placebo-controlled study.The Renal Laboratory, Royal North Shore Hospital (younger adults) and Clinical Room, St Vincents Hospital (elderly subjects).45 younger adults (35 +/- 9 years), and 41 elderly subjects (29 males, 12 females; 78 +/- 3 years). All subjects were healthy and non-institutionalized. The elderly subjects were screened to exclude significant pathology (clinical assessment, multiple investigations).Blood samples were drawn from all younger and elderly subjects. The elderly subjects were randomly allocated indomethacin or placebo for 1 month. Following a 1 to 2-week washout, the alternative was administered for a further 1 month.Plasma AVP and serum osmolality and plasma AVP, serum, and urine osmolality at baseline were measured on indomethacin and placebo.In the elderly subjects, baseline plasma AVP concentration was significantly higher than in the younger subjects studied (4.7 +/- 0.7 vs 2.1 +/- 0.2 pg/mL respectively; P = 0.0003). Plasma AVP was strongly correlated with serum osmolality in the younger subjects (r = 0.76, P = 0.0001) but not in the elderly cohort (r = -0.18, P = 0.26). No difference was found between the sexes in plasma AVP (P = 0.89), and indomethacin treatment did not alter the plasma AVP/urine osmolality ratio (P = 0.85) in the elderly subjects. In addition, changes in plasma AVP with indomethacin therapy did not correlate with changes in serum osmolality (r = 0.16, P = 0.09).Aging is accompanied by an increase in plasma AVP concentrations. In healthy, elderly subjects, plasma AVP is not dependent on serum osmolality and is not influenced by gender. Indomethacin has no effect on the renal responsiveness to plasma AVP.Estimation of body composition by bioelectrical impedance in cancer patients.Measurement of body composition is important in the assessment of nutritional status in cancer patients. The purpose of this study was to validate the bioelectrical impedance (BI) method for body composition estimation in 33 elderly cancer patients (mean age 66 +/- 9 years) using the deuterium dilution technique (2H2O) as the reference method. Height2/Resistance (H2/R) correlated significantly with total body water (TBW) computed from 2H2O (r = 0.89, P less than 0.001; s.e.e. = 2.4 l). The prediction equation for TBW improved significantly (P less than 0.001) by addition of H2/R to the predictor variables weight, height, age and sex. We conclude that BI is a useful measure for the assessment of body composition in cancer patients.Dehydration among long-term care elderly patients with oropharyngeal dysphagia.Long-term care (LTC) residents, especially the orally fed with dysphagia, are prone to dehydration. The clinical consequences of dehydration are critical. The validity of the common laboratory parameters of hydration status is far from being absolute, especially so in the elderly. However, combinations of these indices are more reliable.Assessment of hydration status among elderly LTC residents with oropharyngeal dysphagia.A total of 28 orally fed patients with grade-2 feeding difficulties on the functional outcome swallowing scale (FOSS) and 67 naso-gastric tube (NGT)-fed LTC residents entered the study. The common laboratory, serum and urinary tests were used as indices of hydration status. The results were considered as indicative of dehydration and used as 'markers of dehydration', if they were above the accepted normal values.The mean number of dehydration markers was significantly higher in the FOSS-2 group (3.8 +/- 1.3 vs. 2 +/- 1.4, p = 0.000). About 75% of these FOSS-2 patients had > or =4 dehydration markers versus 18% of the NGT-fed group (p = 0.000). A low urine output (<800 ml/day) was significantly more common in the FOSS-2 group (39 vs. 12%, p = 0.002). Above normal values of blood urea nitrogen (BUN), BUN/serum creatinine ratio (BUN/S(Cr)), urine/serum osmolality ratio (U/S(Osm)), and urine osmolality U(Osm), were significantly more frequent in the dehydration-prone FOSS-2 group. This combination of 4 indices was present in 65% of low urine output patients. In contrast, it was present in only 36% of the higher urine output patients (p = 0.01). Patients with a 'normal' daily urine output (>800 ml/day) also had a significant number (2 +/- 1.5) of positive indices of dehydration.Dehydration was found to be common among orally fed FOSS-2 LTC patients. Surprisingly, probable dehydration, although of a mild degree, was not a rarity among NGT-fed patients either. The combination of 4 parameters, BUN, BUN/S(Cr ), U/S(Osm) and U(Osm), offers reasonable reliability to be used as an indication of dehydration status in daily clinical practice.Volaemic assessment of the elderly hyponatraemic patient: reliability of clinical assessment and validation of bioelectrical impedance analysis.Hyponatraemia is the commonest electrolyte disturbance of hospital inpatients. Assessment of volaemic status is an important part of diagnosis and management.To determine reliability of clinical assessment of volaemic state by assessing inter-observer variability of clinical measures of volaemic state. To assess validity of bioelectrical impedance analysis as a tool to measure total body water in elderly hyponatraemic patients.Observational study conducted in a Department of Medicine for the Elderly.Hospital inpatients >65 years old (n=22) with serum sodium concentration <130 mmol/l were included. Two assessors determined volaemic state on two occasions 72 h apart. Level of agreement between observers was determined on each occasion. Total body water estimation was undertaken with bioelectrical impedance analysis and measurement of dilution of deuterium oxide. Correlation between these two measures was then analysed.Cohen's κ for agreement between two observers for overall assessment of volaemic state was 0.59 (P<0.01). Values for agreement between individual clinical markers of volaemic state ranged between 0.16 and 0.45. Pearson correlation coefficient (r) for correlation between estimation of total body water undertaken by bioelectrical impedance analysis and by measurement of dilution of deuterium oxide was 0.69 (P<0.001).There was moderate inter-observer agreement of overall clinical volaemic assessment of elderly hyponatraemic patients. Total body water estimation by bioelectrical impedance analysis correlates well with estimation by measurement of dilution of deuterium oxide, providing a potentially useful tool to improve the management of the elderly hyponatraemic patient.Biochemical and body composition analysis of nocturia in the elderly.Nocturia is a common symptom in the elderly, and various contributing factors have been suggested. Therefore, in order to investigate which factors are strongly related to occurrence of nocturia, we performed a suite of examinations.One hundred eighty volunteers were divided into three groups: a young adult control group (60 healthy persons without nocturia), an elderly control group (60 healthy persons with a low mean frequency of nocturnal urination, i.e., <once per night), and an elderly nocturia group (60 healthy persons with a high mean frequency of nocturnal urination, i.e., more than twice per night). Biochemistry tests, measurement of the osmotic pressure of plasma and urine, and body composition analysis were performed in three groups during the daytime and nighttime. In the elderly control group and the elderly nocturia group, measurement of blood pressure and recording of urinary frequency-volume charts were performed.The features specific to the elderly nocturia group are as follows: (1) a decrease of the nighttime plasma melatonin level, (2) an increase of nighttime plasma catecholamine levels, (3) an increase of daytime and nighttime plasma natriuretic peptide levels, (4) an increase of blood pressure, (5) a decrease of daytime and nighttime urinary osmotic pressure, (6) an increase of total urine volume, and (7) an increase of the edema ratio before sleeping.These results suggest that sleep disturbance, hypertension, and excessive fluid intake are major factors contributing to an increased frequency of nocturnal urination (>twice per night) in the elderly.Reducing hydration-linked events in nursing home residents.The authors used a quasi-experimental treatment and control group design with 49 participants from four nursing homes to test the effectiveness of an 8-week hydration intervention in reducing hydration-linked events (HLEs). A Kaplan Meier survival curve with log rank test was calculated to determine incidence and time to occurrence of a HLE. Incidence of and time to a HLE did not differ between the treatment and control groups over an 8-week period (p > .05). However, treatment group participants were found to be more frail, more cognitively impaired and more at risk for acute confusion than the control group participants. Although there were no statistically significant differences between the groups, it is clinically significant that the frailer, more at-risk participants in the treatment group had a lower incidence of HLEs.Arginine vasopressin and nocturnal polyuria in older adults with frequent nighttime voiding.We determined in older adults whether frequent nighttime voiding is associated with urine overproduction at night or nocturnal polyuria (NP) and whether NP is associated with abnormalities of arginine vasopressin (AVP) blood levels and/or renal responsiveness to AVP.We used a convenience sample of adults 65 years and older in home and general clinical research center settings. A total of 45 participants completed the 3-day general clinical research center stay. We used 7-day voiding diaries to determine which participants had 2 or greater nighttime voids and NP, defined as 35% or greater of 24-hour urine output at night. Abnormalities in AVP release and secretion were determined by water deprivation testing and by twice daily blood AVP measurement.There was a strong positive association between the number of nighttime voids and the proportion of urine produced at night (r = 0.6, p <0.001). There was no association between NP and AVP blood levels or action. Participants with and without NP had similar maximum urine osmolality following water deprivation and exogenous AVP administration (mean 549 mOsm, range 422 to 713 and 547 mOsm, range 353 to 692, respectively).We found no association between NP and AVP abnormalities in this sample of older adults. Study participants had low maximal urine osmolality in response to fluid deprivation and exogenous vasopressin administration irrespective of whether they were identified as having NP.Indices of dehydration among frail nursing home patients: highly variable but stable over time.To determine changes in standard laboratory measures of dehydration among residents of a nursing home care unit (NHCU) over a 6-month period.A prospective cohort analytic study.A 130-bed NHCU in a Department of Veterans Affairs Hospital.Fifteen infirm but stable male residents (mean age 77 years; range (R) 62-93) on one ward of the NHCU.We studied prospectively for 6 months the serum osmolality (osm), serum sodium (Na), blood urea nitrogen/creatinine (BUN/Cr) ratios and weight (wt) for 15 patients of the NHCU. None of the patients was acutely ill during the study period or exhibited clinical signs of dehydration.Mean serum osm at baseline: 291.6 mOsm/kg (R 278 to 300); 3 months: 291.5 mOsm/kg (R 276 to 301); 6 months: 291.3 mOsm/kg (R 283-300) were all similar. Forty percent (6/15) of patients had at least one high normal/elevated reading (> or = 295 mOsm/kg) during the study. Three patients (20%) had readings of > or = 300 mOsm/kg, but none of these patients had either concurrent increased serum Na (> or = 146 mmole/L) or BUN/Cr ratios (> or = 25). Mean serum Na at baseline: 143.0 mmole/L (R 139-148); 3 months: 142.1 mmole/L (R 138-149); 6 months: 142.9 mmole/L (R 137-150) were all similar. Sixty percent (9/15) of the patients maintained normal (nl) serum Na levels throughout the study. The relationship between the change in serum Na and serum osm levels from baseline to 6 months was not significant (r = 0.242). BUN/Cr ratios ranged from 12-34 over the study period with 3 of 15 patients (20%) demonstrating elevated ratios consistently throughout the study without clinical evidence of dehydration. Only two patients had both high nl/elevated serum osm and elevated serum Na, although both had nl BUN/Cr ratios. Neither of these patients was thought by staff to be clinically dehydrated. Analysis of variance (ANOVA) indicated none of the laboratory measures changed significantly over time (serum osm: F(2,28) < 1; Na: F(2,28) < 1; BUN/Cr: F(2,28) < 1). There was no significant change in weight between the baseline and six month readings.These data suggest that in the presence of clinical stability, long-term care residents may have a serum osm in the high normal/elevated range without overt clinical evidence of dehydration, an accompanying elevated Na, or BUN/Cr ratio. This may indicate a different central osm setting for these residents as the serum osm appeared to be stable for each resident over time. These data also suggest that measures of serum osm, Na, and BUN/Cr in the long-term care setting may accurately predict future laboratory values in an individual patient if baseline values are drawn when the patient is not acutely ill.Association of plasma adiponectin levels with cellular hydration state measured using bioelectrical impedance analysis in patients with COPD.It is widely recognized that chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD) includes a variety of extra pulmonary complications and comorbidities. Recently, adiponectin was shown to regulate cellular metabolism in humans. Cellular hydration state is affected by a variety of hormonal factors and regulates cellular metabolic state. Therefore, this study was designed to determine whether adiponectin is a possible factor involved in cellular hydration state in COPD.Thirty patients with COPD and 41 age-matched controls participated in the study. Plasma levels of total and high molecular weight (HMW) adiponectin were measured and anthropometry and pulmonary function tests were conducted. Intracellular water (ICW), extracellular water (ECW), and ECW/ICW ratio, which are parameters of cellular hydration state, were measured using bioelectrical impedance analysis.Higher levels of total and HMW adiponectin in plasma were found in patients with COPD compared with levels in controls. A significant inverse correlation was observed between body mass index and plasma levels of total and HMW adiponectin in the control group. However, this significant correlation was not observed in patients with COPD. The plasma levels of total and HMW adiponectin were also not significantly correlated with any pulmonary function parameters in patients with COPD. Regarding the state of cellular hydration, the plasma levels of total adiponectin were inversely correlated with the ECW/ICW ratio and positively with ICW values in patients with COPD. Moreover, closer correlations were found between these parameters and plasma HMW adiponectin levels.The results of the present study suggest a novel association of the plasma adiponectin with cellular hydration state in patients with COPD. Accordingly, lower adiponectin levels may result in cellular shrinkage, leading to metabolic malfunction at a cellular level. Thus, our findings provide new insights regarding the preventive roles of adiponectin in the progression of comorbidities in COPD.A comparison of water turnover in older people in community and institutional settings.Maintaining water balance is essential for health, but environmental factors, pathology and the ageing process can adversely affect water homeostasis.This study examined the relationship between physical dependency and daily water turnover rate in an older population.Daily water turnover (DWT) was estimated, using deuterium oxide ((2)H(2)O) as a tracer for water, over two separate 7-day periods in summer and winter in two older populations. The independent group (N = 22) lived in their own homes and were self-caring. The dependent group (N = 15) lived in institutional care, and were more physically dependent. None of the subjects had significant mental impairment. Total body water (TBW) and DWT were estimated from the equilibration concentration of ingested (2)H(2)O and its subsequent elimination rate.The independent group had a median (range) age of 75(69-88) y, a mean Barthel Index (BI) of 19.8, and a mean Abbreviated Mental Test (AMT) score of 9.8. The dependent group were older (83(72-93) y), with a mean BI of 13 and a mean AMT of 9.3. Average median (range) DWT in the independent group was similar in summer (2.2(1.3-3.6) l.d(-1)) and winter (2.1(1.4-3.6) l.d(-1)), but faster than in the dependent group (1.5(0.9-2.9) and 1.6(1.0-2.8) l.d(-1), respectively) during the same two periods. Median urine output in the independent group was similar in summer (1.7(0.8-3.3) l.d(-1)) and winter (1.7(0.9-3.2) l.d(-1)), but greater than in the dependent group (1.1(0.6-2.7) and 0.9(0.5-1.6) l.d(-1), respectively).These results show that the water turnover rate of many older people is low, and that intake may be affected especially in those with physical disability.Early identification of hypovolemia using total body resistance measurements in long-term care facility residents.Clinical management of fluid imbalance continues to be a major challenge in the long-term care industry. A proactive method of recognizing hypovolemia (reduced total body fluid) in its early stages is greatly needed.The goals of this research were 3-fold: (1) to determine the mean total body resistance(TBR) of an unmatched population of long-term care facility (LTCF) residents and correlate increased levels of TBR with evidence of fluid imbalance; (2) to identify patients at risk for hypovolemia by using TBR measurements as an objective guide; and (3) to suggest nursing practices designed to increase hydration in LTCF residents.Two pairs of electrocardiograph-type electrodes were placed on the right humeral-carpal junction and at the level of the right lateral malleolus of each patient. A 50-kHz signal was introduced to the outer electrode of each pair; the inner electrode detected variation of the resistance to the signal as a function of ionic conduction through the electrolyte content of body fluids. Resistance, reactance, and phase angle were measured.The medical records of patients in 26 LTCFs (17 urban, 9 rural) in north-central and east Texas were reviewed during 2001. The mean age of the 1225 study patients (754 women, 471 men) was 76 years; mean height was 165.8 cm, and mean body weight was 71.9 kg. The mean TBR (right wrist-right ankle) for men and women was 504.81 ohms. Based on this measurement and a measurement of 629 ohms in residents judged to be hypovolemic on the basis of abnormal clinical laboratory data, patients with a wrist-ankle resistance >550 ohms were considered at risk for hypovolemia and possibly clinically significant dehydration. Subsequent measurements of TBR revealed a reduction consistent with levels in the normal range.In these studies, TBR measurements correlated inversely with total body water and fluid compartments. Extracellular fluid compartments were found to be larger in females than in males, reflecting larger cellular mass in males. Total body resistivity was found to be higher in females than in males, which may have implications for body composition metrics. TBR provides a reference for comparison with both clinical and laboratory findings. The ability to identify LTCF residents at risk for hypovolemia, using noninvasive bedside measurements, may offer a definitive guideline for management of adequate fluid balance.Validation of multi-frequency bioelectrical impedance analysis in detecting changes in fluid balance of geriatric patients.Multi-Frequency Bioelectrical Impedance Analysis (MFBIA) is a quick, simple, and inexpensive method to assess body fluid compartments. This study aimed at determining the validity of MFBIA in detecting clinically relevant changes of fluid balance in geriatric patients.A prospective, observational study.The 22-bed Geriatric Department of the University Hospital Nijmegen.Hospitalized patients were eligible if they did not have a pacemaker, were not suffering from terminal illnesses, and did not have psychogeriatric diseases likely to interfere with capacity to consent or comply. During a 16-months period, 218 patients were admitted, of whom 78 patients were eligible and 53 consented to participate.Each subject's fluid balance was diagnosed twice a week as dehydrated, overhydrated, or euvolemic, based on standardized physical examination, laboratory tests, and weight evaluation. Changes in fluid balance were quantified by measuring total body water (TBW) and extracellular fluid (ECF) applying deuterium- and bromide-dilution techniques. Impedance at 1, 5, 50, and 100 kHz and body weight were measured daily. Sensitivity and Guyatt's responsiveness indexes of MFBIA in detecting dehydration and overhydration were determined.In total, 1071 MFBIA measurements were performed, during which 14 transitions from dehydration to euvolemia and 13 transitions from overhydration to euvolemia were monitored. Rehydration of dehydrated patients caused an increase in TBW and ECF of 3.4 +/- 1.8 L and 1.9 +/- 1.9 L, respectively, which resulted in significant decreases in impedance of 133 +/- 67 omega at 1 kHz and 93 +/- 61 omega at 100 kHz (P = .001). Treatment of overhydrated patients caused a TBW and ECF loss of 3.8 +/- 4.2 L and 3.1 +/- 3.8 L, respectively, which resulted in significant increases in impedance of 104 +/- 72 omega at 1 kHz and 81 +/- 68 omega at 100 kHz (P < .001). Sensitivity of a single MFBIA in diagnosing dehydration and overhydration was 14% and 17%, respectively. Responsiveness indexes of weighing and MFBIA for dehydration and overhydration were similar at all frequencies and greater than one.The sensitivity of a single impedance measurement in detecting dehydration and overhydration was low. However, responsiveness of serial measurements to intra-individual changes in fluid balance was good. Therefore, this noninvasive technique may be used in clinical practice to improve monitoring fluid balance in geriatric patients, especially when daily weighing is difficult.Fluid balance in elderly patients following acute stroke.We studied the relationship between plasma osmolality, arginine vasopressin (AVP), and fluid input in patients during the acute phase of a first stroke. Fifteen consecutive patients were studied (median age 79) and their blood sampled on days 0, 1, 2, 3, 7 and 14. Plasma osmolality was related to fluid input over days 0-3 (p = 0.0013) and AVP over 14 days (p less than 0.001). Patients with a poor outcome had higher AVP concentrations (p = 0.02). Those on intravenous fluids received a higher volume (p less than 0.01) and had a lower plasma osmolality (p = 0.04). The results of this preliminary study indicate that a standard regime for fluid input is inappropriate.Prediction of body composition in elderly men over 75 years of age.A comprehensive number of body composition predictions (involving weight, height, skinfold thicknesses, bioelectrical impedance and near-infrared interactance-NIRI) were evaluated against total body water (TBW from isotope dilution), in 23 randomly selected men over 75 years old, and dual-energy X-ray absorptiometry (DXA), in 15 volunteers from this group. Comparisons were made between anthropometric and impedance methods for estimating limb muscle mass (obtained using DXA). Bias and 95% limits of agreement between measured TBW and DXA estimates were -2.1 kg and 3.1 kg, respectively (for fat, 5.4% and 6.1% body weight). Agreement between TBW predictions and reference measurements was remarkably variable, irrespective of whether TBW was predicted from TBW-specific equations or indirectly from estimates of fat or fat-free mass: for predictions using anthropometry, bias ranged from -4.7 kg to 1.6 kg and 95% limits of agreement from bias +/- 3.8 kg to +/- 5.0 kg; using impedance, bias was -8.8 kg to 3.2 kg and 95% limits of agreement were bias +/- 3.6 kg to +/- 7.8 kg; corresponding values for NIRI were -5.3 kg and +/- 5.4 kg. Although some non-age-specific equations appeared valid, age-specific equations generally predicted TBW better. Limb muscle mass (DXA) was predicted better using the segmental impedance method, from indices of limb muscle area (r = 0.76; SEE = 1.9 kg) and volume (r = 0.86; SEE = 1.6 kg), than by anthropometry alone (r = 0.61 and 0.71; SEE = 2.3 kg and 2.1 kg, respectively). In conclusion, some body composition predictions are unacceptable (at least for TBW) in older men, and care is recommended when selecting from these methods or equations. Also, the segmental impedance method is as good as, if not better than, anthropometry alone in predicting limb muscle mass (DXA) in older men.Axillary sweating in clinical assessment of dehydration in ill elderly patients.A pilot study to assess if urine specific gravity and urine colour charts are useful indicators of dehydration in acute stroke patients.The purpose of this pilot study was to examine whether urine specific gravity and urine colour could provide an early warning of dehydration in stroke patients compared with standard blood indicators of hydration status.Dehydration after stroke has been associated with increased blood viscosity, venous thrombo-embolism and stroke mortality at 3-months. Earlier identification of dehydration might allow us to intervene to prevent significant dehydration developing or reduce its duration to improve patient outcomes.We recruited 20 stroke patients in 2007 and measured their urine specific gravity with urine test strips, a refractometer, and urine colour of specimens taken daily on 10 consecutive days and compared with the routine blood urea:creatinine ratios over the same period to look for trends and relationships over time. The agreement between the refractometer, test strips and urine colour were expressed as a percentage with 95% confidence intervals.Nine (45%) of the 20 stroke patients had clinical signs of dehydration and had a significantly higher admission median urea:creatinine ratio (P = 0·02, Mann-Whitney U-test). There were no obvious relationships between urine specific gravity and urine colour with the urea:creatinine ratio. Of the 174 urine samples collected, the refractometer agreed with 70/174 (40%) urine test strip urine specific gravity and 117/174 (67%) urine colour measurements.Our results do not support the use of the urine test strip urine specific gravity as an early indicator of dehydration. Further research is required to develop a practical tool for the early detection of dehydration in stroke patients.Hypernatremia in hospitalized patients.To determine the incidence, clinical characteristics, and outcome for general medical-surgical hospital patients with hypernatremia.A prospective cohort study.A 942-bed urban university hospital.All patients who developed a serum sodium concentration of 150 mmol/L or greater during a 3-month observation period.Daily fluid balance, mental status, and serum and urine electrolytes and osmolality.103 patients were identified. Eighteen patients were hypernatremic on hospital admission, and 85 developed hypernatremia during hospitalization. Patients who developed hypernatremia during hospitalization were younger than patients who developed hypernatremia before hospital admission (mean age +/- SD, 58.9 +/- 19.2 years compared with 76.6 +/- 16.6 years; P < 0.01) but did not differ in age from the patients of the general hospitalized population. Eighty-nine percent of patients who developed hypernatremia during hospitalization had urine concentrating defects, primarily as the result of the use of diuretics or of solute diuresis, whereas only 50% of patients who were hypernatremic on admission could be shown to have concentrating defects (P < 0.01). Fifty-five percent of all hypernatremic patients had increased insensible water losses, and 35% had increased enteral water losses. Eighty-six percent of patients with hospital-acquired hypernatremia lacked free access to water, 74% had enteral water intake of less than 1 L/d, and 94% received less than 1 L of intravenous electrolyte-free water per day during the development of hypernatremia. No supplemental electrolyte-free water was prescribed during the first 24 hours of hypernatremia in 49% of patients. The duration of hypernatremia was shorter in patients who were hypernatremic on admission (median duration, 3 days) than in patients with hospital-acquired hypernatremia (median duration, 5 days; P < 0.05). Mortality was 41% for all patients, but hypernatremia was judged to have contributed to mortality in only 16% of patients.Although the development of hypernatremia before hospital admission occurs primarily in geriatric patients, hospital-acquired hypernatremia was more common in our cohort and had an age distribution similar to that of the general hospitalized population. Hospital-acquired hypernatremia was primarily iatrogenic, resulting from inadequate and inappropriate prescription of fluids to patients with predictably increased water losses and impaired thirst or restricted free water intake or both. Treatment of hypernatremia is often inadequate or delayed. Efforts to manage hypernatremia better and altogether avoid hospital-acquired hypernatremia should focus on both physician education and the development of hospital systems to prevent errors in fluid prescription.[Accumulated fluid balance in patients admitted to the ICU: is it really reliable?].In most of the textbooks, it is considered that the balance calculated after admission and the losses measured and/or estimated is an inexact way of establishing the real balance. Thus daily monitoring of the weight variations is recommended as a single possible alternative. On the other hand, there are few studies that have strictly studied the reliability of the fluid balance calculated. We also have not found any study in middle-long stay critical patients. These circumstances have led us to design an observational prospective study that will allow us to know if the accumulated balance calculated after admission and loses adequately reflect the weight changes in middle-long stay patients. We include 20 patients who were weighed every 48 hours (at least 3 times each one) and we compare the weight changes with the balances calculated. We find that, above all after the 6th day, the accumulated balance calculated adequately reflected the weight changes (mean error/day < 250 ml), regardless of the presence or not of fever, sweat, oral diet, feces or mechanical ventilation. When weight on admission to the ICU was less than 75 kg, the changes in the balance calculated adjusted even more to the weight change, the contrary occurring when the weight was greater than 75 kg. These findings suggest that the accumulated balance calculated represents a valid alternative to daily weighing of the patients and that factors such as body mass and/or surface should be taken into account to reach more exact estimations.Hyponatremia among the institutionalized elderly in 2 long-term care facilities in Taipei.Hyponatremia is common in the institutionalized elderly, and syndrome of inappropriate antidiuretic hormone secretion was deemed the most important etiologic factor. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the prevalence and etiologic factors of hyponatremia among institutionalized elderly and to explore its association with nutritional status.Subjects in 2 private long-term care facilities (LTCFs) participated in this study. Periodic nutritional evaluations, including anthropometric measurements and serial laboratory examinations, were performed every 6 months. When hyponatremia was identified, serum osmolality, serum levels of cortisol, thyrotropin, antidiuretic hormone, urine osmolality, and electrolyte profile were done instantly. Water loading tests were performed for subjects with euvolemic, hypo-osmolar hyponatremia. Nutritional status (i.e. hemoglobin, serum albumin, serum total cholesterol, body mass index [BMI], and mean body weight loss within 6 months) was compared between hyponatremic and normonatremic subjects during hyponatremic episodes and at follow-up (6 months later).In total, 67 (mean age = 77.2 +/- 8.8 years, M/F = 45/22) LTCF residents were enrolled. The prevalence of hyponatremia was 31.3% (21/67) during the 6-month period, and 62.5% of these cases were related to reset osmostat. In addition, BMI was similar between hyponatremic and normonatremic subjects during hyponatremic episodes (19.1 +/- 3.2 vs 20.5 +/- 4.0 kg/m2, p = 0.16), but became significantly lower in hyponatremic subjects 6 months later (18.5 +/- 3.2 vs 20.8 +/- 4.2 kg/m2, p = 0.027). However, the mean body weight loss during the 6-month follow-up was similar (3.0% vs 0.8%, p = 0.25). Furthermore, hemoglobin and serum levels of albumin were similar between groups during hyponatremic episodes and at follow-ups, but serum levels of total cholesterol were significantly lower in hyponatremic subjects on both occasions (166.9 +/- 30.5 vs 190.2 +/- 38.2 mg/dL, p = 0.016 during hyponatremic episodes and 153.6 +/- 29.4 vs 182.8 +/- 35.5 mg/dL, p = 0.003 at follow-up).About a third of LTC-dwelling elderly would experience hyponatremia during the 6-month period, and 62.5% of them were due to reset osmostat. The relationship between hyponatremia and undernutrition deserves further investigation.Body composition by bioelectrical-impedance analysis compared with deuterium dilution and skinfold anthropometry in patients with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.Body composition is an important measure of nutritional status in patients with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD). We generated a regression model for bioelectrical impedance (BI) by using deuterium dilution (2H2O) as a reference method in 32 COPD patients, aged 63 +/- 9 y (mean +/- SD), in stable pulmonary and cardiac condition. Height squared divided by resistance (Ht2/Res) correlated well with total body water (TBW) as measured by 2H2O (r = 0.93, P less than 0.001, SEE = 1.9 L). The best-fitting regression equation to predict TBW comprised Ht2/Res and body weight (r2 = 0.89, SEE = 1.8 L, P less than 0.001). BI-predicted TBW was used to estimate BI-fat-free mass (FFM) that was compared with skinfold-thickness-based FFM predictions (Anthr-FFM). Relative to BI-FFM a significant overestimation of 4.4 +/- 0.8 kg was found by Anthr-FFM. Our results suggest that BI is a useful measure of body composition in patients with severe COPD.Total body water in elderly adults--assessing hydration status by bioelectrical impedance analysis vs urine osmolality.Fluid balance in critically ill patients. Should we really rely on it?The computation of fluid balances (FBs) by subtracting fluid outputs from inputs is a common critical care practice. Limited information exists about the accuracy and consistency of nurse-registered cumulative FBs and regarding the value of suggested corrections for non-measurable losses.From 147 ICU patients, we prospectively evaluated the cumulative FBs and their relationship to changes in body weight (BW). Standardised measurements of BW were performed on admission and discharge. FB charts were accurately reviewed and arithmetic errors corrected. Net cumulative FBs and adjusted cumulative FBs (considering sensible or insensible fluid losses/fever/liquid faeces) were analysed for all patients and 3 subgroups (cardiac-cerebral, septic, and others). Agreement between FBs and BW changes was calculated according to the defined subgroups and confounding variables.Cumulative FBs were inaccurate in 49 cases (33%) with errors ranging from -3606 mL to +2020 mL. The total (average daily) difference between measured BW and FBs (mean ± SD) was 0.185±1.874 kg (0.101±1.020 kg). Correlation (r(2)) and Bland-Altman agreement was poor between BW changes and net cumulative FBs (0.552 and -1.26±5.41 kg) and slightly better between BW changes and adjusted cumulative FBs (0.714 and +0.18±3.68 kg). Standard deviations of the average daily differences between BW changes and FBs were always >1 L. Correction of the net FBs as suggested in the literature were not useful. New multiple regression models only modestly improved correlation.For a large portion of patients nurse-registered cumulative FBs are neither accurate nor do they agree with standardised BW measurements. Patient care and clinical decision-making should be based on more objective techniques.Efficacy of desmopressin in treatment of refractory nocturia in patients older than 65 years.To evaluate the efficacy of desmopressin treatment in patients 65 years old and older with nocturia and to determine whether baseline urodynamic characteristics influenced the outcome of treatment.Patients with nocturia three or more times a night and nocturnal polyuria refractory to medication were treated with oral desmopressin 0.1 mg at bedtime for 4 weeks. Data from urodynamic studies and a voiding diary, nocturnal urine volume, urine specific gravity, serum sodium and potassium level, and quality of life index were measured at baseline, 4 weeks, and 4 weeks after discontinuation of treatment.A total of 30 patients (25 men and 5 women) were enrolled in the study. The mean age was 75.4 +/- 6.6 years. Five patients (16.7%) reported side effects, including hyponatremia in one. Twenty patients (66.7%) reported a good response with both reduced nocturnal frequency (5.2 +/- 1.16 times versus 2.24 +/- 1.12 times a night, P = 0.000) and urine volume (955.6 +/- 255.9 mL versus 522.8 +/- 210.5 mL, P <0.0001). Two patients (6.7%) had improved nocturnal frequency, and 3 patients (10%) reported no effect at all. After discontinuing the medication for 4 weeks, 13 patients (52%) had improved symptoms compared with baseline and 6 (24%) remained at their post-treatment frequency of nocturia. Urodynamic studies revealed that 15 patients had detrusor instability and 17 had a cystometric capacity of 250 mL or less. No significant difference was found in the success rate relative to the urodynamic results.Desmopressin is safe and effective in the treatment of severe nocturia in patients 65 years old and older.The effect of tube feeding on the hydration of elderly patients.The relationship between dehydration and parotid salivary gland function in young and older healthy adults.Saliva is essential for the maintenance of oral health. The primary constituent of saliva is water and, traditionally, decreased body water homeostasis has been linked with salivary dysfunction. This is consistent with the greater prevalence of dehydration and salivary gland dysfunction among the elderly. However, this association between dehydration and salivary dysfunction has never been tested using objective criteria. The purpose of this study was to determine the effect of body dehydration upon parotid salivary flow rates in young and older healthy adults.Twelve young (20-40 years) and 12 older (60-80 years) healthy subjects abstained from food and beverage intake for 24 h (dehydration) and then underwent intravenous rehydration to replace all lost weight. Unstimulated and stimulated parotid salivary flow rates, weight, hematocrit, hemoglobin, serum sodium, plasma protein, creatinine, serum, and urine osmolality values were assessed at baseline, 24 h, and 1 h after the completion of rehydration.All subjects experienced a significant decrease in weight and increased levels of hematocrit, hemoglobin, plasma protein, and creatinine during dehydration with few age-related differences. Intravenous fluid replacement increased weight and decreased hematocrit, hemoglobin, plasma protein, and creatinine back to baseline values, demonstrating that subjects were metabolically rehydrated. Unstimulated (young and older, p = .0001) and stimulated (young, p > .05; older, p = .03) parotid flow rates decreased during the 24-h dehydration period, yet did not completely return (young and older unstimulated, p < .001; young and older stimulated, p > .05) to baseline values after rehydration.These findings suggest that body dehydration is associated with decreased parotid salivary gland flow rates, and that these changes are generally age-independent in healthy adults. Furthermore, although subjects were metabolically rehydrated, unstimulated salivary flow rates remained significantly lower than baseline levels.Physical signs of dehydration in the elderly.Dehydration is a common condition and frequent cause of hospitalization in older people, despite the caregiver's high attention in attempt to avoid its occurrence. In this study, various physical signs were examined as clinical signs of dehydration in elderly.A prospective observational study was conducted in an acute care teaching hospital. Consecutive elderly patients who were admitted to the Department of Medicine were evaluated. Dehydration was defined as a calculated serum osmolality above 295 mOsm/L. The patients diagnosed as dehydrated or not dehydrated were observed for physical signs of dehydration. Data of blood and urine chemistry analysis were also compared between the two groups.A total of 27 elderly patients admitted with acute medical conditions were included in this study. For the physical signs, dry axilla had moderate sensitivity (44%) and excellent specificity (89%) to detect dehydration. Sunken eyes and delayed capillary refill time also showed relatively good specificity (83%). For laboratory data, the mean concentrations of serum sodium of the dehydrated group (146 mEq/L) was significantly higher (p<0.01) than those of the non-dehydrated group (134 mEq/L).Physical signs of dehydration in elderly showed relatively good specificity but poor sensitivity. The evaluation of the axillary moisture could help assess dehydration as well as laboratory data analysis such as serum sodium concentration.Clinical and laboratory profile information in the prediction of death in elderly patients.A study of prognosis over the first six weeks following admission to a department of geriatric medicine compared the predictive value of a clinical assessment at admission with other more objective parameters such as profile investigations, mental test score and assessment of dehydration and constitutional upset. A total of 739 patients were studied prospectively. The clinical assessment proved to be by far the strongest predictor of six-week mortality. In men the prediction it gave was not improved significantly by addition of the other factors. In women serum albumin, blood urea and assessment of constitutional upset added significantly to the prediction, thought the overall improvement in classification was small and mental test score made a borderline contribution only.Use of foot veins to monitor hydration in the elderly.Water balance, hydration status, and fat-free mass hydration in younger and older adults.Older adults are at increased risk of dehydration, yet water balance is understudied in this population.This controlled diet study assessed the effect of age on water input, output, and balance in healthy adults. Hydration status (plasma osmolality and urine specific gravity) and body composition were also measured.Eleven men and 14 women aged 23-46 y and 10 men and 11 women aged 63-81 y were subjects. Water balance was assessed during days 7-10 of three 18-d controlled feeding trials with protein intakes of 0.50, 0.75, and 1.00 g . kg(-1) . d(-1). Total water input included water from the provided foods and beverages, ad libitum intake, and metabolic production. Water output included the losses in urine and stool and the insensible losses from respiration and nonsweating perspiration.Ad libitum water consumption, total water intake, water output through urine, total water output, and net water balance were not different in the older subjects than in the younger subjects. Markers of hydration status were within the range of clinical normalcy for all groups. Total body water (TBW) was not significantly different, fat-free mass (FFM) was significantly lower (P < 0.05), and FFM hydration (TBW:FFM) was significantly higher (P < 0.05) in the older subjects than in the younger subjects. Dietary protein intake did not influence any of these results.These results show that healthy older adults maintain water input, output, and balance comparable to those of younger adults and have no apparent changes in hydration status. The results support that the hydration of FFM is increased in older men and women.Bioelectrical impedance analysis estimation of water compartments in elderly diseased patients: the source study.This study validates, in geriatric patients, bioelectrical impedance analysis (BIA) equations that had been derived to estimate total body water (TBW) and extracellular water (ECW) in healthy elderly subjects.We performed a multicentric trial in six geriatric wards. We studied 169 patients with varying degrees of hydration: dehydrated, euvolemic, and overhydrated. BIA estimates of TBW and of ECW were compared with the measurement of TBW with (18)O dilution and of ECW with bromide (Br) dilution.BIA estimated TBW with a difference of 0.48 +/- 2.3 l (mean +/- SD) (50 kHz; p = .01) and 0.69 +/- 2.2 l (100 kHz; p < 0.001) compared with (18)O dilution. The difference was not affected by the hydration status. Estimates of ECW with BIA were systematically biased compared with Br dilution: 4.6 +/- 3.1 l (equation from Segal and colleagues; p < .001) and 3.4 +/- 2.9 l (equation from Visser and colleagues; p < .001). We propose a new, cross-validated equation. Conclusions. Body water spaces can be estimated accurately in geriatric patients with BIA.Experienced consent in geriatrics research: a new method to optimize the capacity to consent in frail elderly subjects.Cognitive and sensory difficulties frequently jeopardize informed consent of frail elderly patients This study is the first to test whether preliminary research experience could enhance geriatric patients' capacity to consent.A step-wise consent procedure was introduced in a study on fluid balance in geriatric patients. Eligible patients providing verbal consent participated in a try-out of a week, during which bioelectrical impedance and weight measurements were performed daily. Afterwards, written informed consent was requested. Comprehension, risk and inconvenience scores (ranges: 0-10) were obtained before and after the try-out by asking ten questions about the study's essentials and by asking for a risk and inconvenience assessment on a ten-points rating scale.Seventy of the 78 eligible subjects started the try-out and 53 (68%) provided written consent. The comprehension score increased from 5.0 (+/- 2.3) to 7.0 (+/- 1.9) following the try-out (P < 0.001). The number of subjects capable of weighing risks and inconveniences increased from 32 to 48 (P < 0.001).Research experience improved the capacity to consent, still enabling an acceptable participation rate. Therefore, experienced consent seems a promising tool to optimize informed consent in frail elderly subjects.Monitoring hypovolemia in healthy elderly subjects by measuring blood pressure response to Valsalva's maneuver.Quantification of hypovolemia by physical examination has limited validity. We explored the use of non-invasive measurement of blood pressure (BP) response to Valsalva's maneuver in monitoring hypovolemia in nine healthy elderly volunteers, recruited from participants of the Nijmegen Annual Four-Days Marches. Heart rate (HR), systolic and diastolic BP, and mean arterial pressure (MAP) response (Finapres) to a Valsalva's maneuver as well as clinical and laboratory assessment of fluid balance were determined 5 minutes before, and 3, 5, and 48 hours after administration of 40 mg furosemide orally. Subjects' (4 males aged 74.2 +/- 3.0 years) weight was 66.1 +/- 9.7 kg, mean BP was 139 +/- 21 over 76 +/- 12 mm Hg. A maximum weight loss of -2.8 +/- 0.9% occurred 5 hours after furosemide administration. Systolic and diastolic BP, HR, clinical assessment scores, and serum creatinine and urea nitrogen did not change during the total study period. Significant changes occurred in Valsalva phase I to phase II systolic BP response (difference +14.2 +/- 11.3 mm Hg, ratio difference -0.09 +/- 0.07 after 5 hours, P < 0.01). Changes after 48 hours did not differ from baseline values. Finapres measurement of Valsalva BP response may be useful in monitoring hypovolemia in the elderly.Monitoring hydration status in elderly veterans.Dehydration is a common water and electrolyte disorder in long-term care residents. Practical methods to detect and monitor dehydration are needed. This study determined whether urine color measured by a urine color chart reflects hydration status. The study employed a repeated measures design with two observations during a 10-hour period. Urine color was compared to the criterion standard of urine specific gravity and osmolality. The sample included 89 participants from two Veterans' Affairs facilities. Urine color was graded on an eight-level color chart. Urine specific gravity and osmolality, serum sodium and osmolality, hematocrit, blood urea nitrogen (BUN), and creatinine were measured using standard laboratory procedures. Significant positive associations existed between urine color and both urine specific gravity and urine osmolality and between urine osmolality and serum sodium and the blood urea nitrogen to creatinine ratio. Although further testing is needed, the color chart has potential as a low-cost technology to monitor dehydration.[The fluid balance in the critically ill patient].In the critically ill patient the hemodynamic management is essential. Usually the hemodynamic status is estimated by the measurement of the intravascular pressure or volume and by computing the fluid balance, while the change in body weight estimates the total body water. The fluid balance is computed by subtracting the fluid output to the input. Although the input (fluids, drugs, infusion.) are well known, the output are difficult to correctly compute, because they depend on several factors such as the body-room temperature, amount of humidity and may change with time. Aim of this study was to prospectively evaluate the accuracy of the fluid balance compared to the body weight measured by a dedicated mattress (Hill-Rom).Fifteen critically ill patients were enrolled (mean age of 63.2+/-19.7 years, body mass index of 24.9+/-3.5 kg/m2) and the measurements were computed every 8 hours. The data were analyzed by the Bland-Altman test.Four-hundred and seventy-two measurements for a mean intensive care stay of 12.3.+/-7.3 days were computed. The Bland-Altamn showed a great inaccuracy, because the agreement (the difference between the 2 methods) was poor with a standard deviation of 1 840 L.Although the fluid balance was not accurate, the only body weight without any intravascular measurement is not helpful for a correct clinical hemodynamic management of the patient.Bioelectrical impedance analysis measurements of total body water and extracellular water in healthy elderly subjects.To address whether: (1) bioelectrical impedance analysis (BIA) can provide precise and accurate estimates of total body water (TBW) and extracellular water (ECW) in healthy elderly subjects, that display age-induced changes in body composition, (2) BIA models are improved by introducing variables related to geometrical body-shape and osmolarity.Cross-validation of available BIA models and models developed in the study.58 healthy elderly subjects (31 women, 27 men, 66.8+/-4.7 y, mean +/- s.d.)BIA at 5, 50 and 100 kHz, 18O labelled water measurements of TBW, Br measurements of ECW, anthropometric variables, plasma osmolarity.Published BIA models for estimating TBW, entail various degrees of bias. Precise models (SEE of the models 0.8 L at 100 kHz, 1.0 L at 50 kHz) involving height2/resistance, weight, gender, circumferences and plasma osmolarity were established with data from 30 subjects chosen at random. Cross-validation of an independent group (n = 28) showed no bias (-1.5+/-3.2 L at 100 kHz, -1.4+/-3.2 L at 50 kHz, P = NS).We conclude that BIA models with increased accuracy and precision for predicting ECW and TBW can be derived in healthy elderly subjects. Repeated measures had a mean difference of 0.2+/-1.2 L.The relation of hydration status to cognitive performance in healthy older adults.Little is known about the relation of hydration status to cognitive performance in older adults, who may be more vulnerable to poor hydration and cognitive impairment. We examined whether hydration status was related to cognitive functioning in 28 healthy community-dwelling older adults. Hierarchical regression models demonstrated that lower hydration status was related to slowed psychomotor processing speed and poorer attention/memory performance, after controlling for demographic variables and blood pressure.Validation of a medical record-based delirium risk assessment.To improve identification of patients at high risk for delirium, this study developed a chart abstraction tool for delirium risk and validated the tool against clinical expert diagnosis of delirium.Prospective cohort study.Tertiary Veterans Affairs hospital in New England.One hundred veterans admitted to the medical service.While admitted, each participant underwent serial assessments for delirium by a clinical expert. Using the four criteria of a validated delirium prediction rule (cognitive impairment, sensory deficit, severe illness, and dehydration), chart review terms were selected for each criterion, and delirium risk was the sum of criteria present (range: 0-4; 4 = worst). After discharge, a nurse blinded to the expert's diagnosis completed the chart tool.The participants were mostly male (94%) and older (mean age 81 ± 7), and 23% developed overall delirium (14% incident). The rate of overall delirium was 11% in participants with zero risk factors, 18% in those with one or two, and 50% in those with three or four (P = .01; c-statistic 0.65, 95% confidence interval (CI) = 0.54-0.76). For incident delirium, the rates were 11%, 13%, and 25%, respectively (P = .53; c-statistic 0.56, 95% CI = 0.42-0.74). Discharge to a rehabilitation center or nursing home increased with increasing delirium risk (0%, 18%, 60%, P = .02).A chart abstraction tool was effective at identifying overall delirium risk but not incident delirium risk. Although the tool cannot replace clinical assessment and diagnosis of delirium, the use of this tool as an educational, clinical, or quality measurement aid warrants additional study.Bioelectrical impedance analysis and other hydration parameters as risk factors for delirium in rural nursing home residents.The study investigators conducted a vigorous screening protocol for delirium in rural long-term care (LTC) facilities for a period of 28 days focusing on Bioelectrical Impedance Analysis (BIA) and other hydration parameters as risk factors.A two-stage cluster sampling procedure was used to randomly select participants (n = 313) from 13 LTC facilities located in southeastern Iowa, stratified on facility bed size. BIA was used to estimate intracellular water (ICW), extracellular water (ECW), and total body water (TBW) on four occasions--baseline and follow-up days 7, 14, and 28. Volume estimates were calculated as a percent of body weight (%WT). Serum electrolytes and hematology were also measured. Delirium was measured with four strict criteria: a NEECHAM Confusion Scale score < 25, Vigilance "A" score > 2, a Mini-Mental Status Examination < baseline, and a positive Confusion Assessment Method score.There were n = 69 delirium cases (22.0%). Blood urea nitrogen/creatinine ratios greater than 21:1 (odds ratio = 1.76, 95% confidence interval 1.02-3.06). No significant risk for delirium was associated with ICW, ECW, or TBW as a percent of body weight.Some changes were observed with a slight decrease in ICW between day 7 and day 14 of follow-up that tended to follow an increase in delirium events, but in general the BIA measures did not predict delirium events.Hydration and acute confusion in long-term care residents.Although it is generally appropriate for a healthy adult to consume 2000 to 2500 ml per day, the literature does not address evaluating any standard. The objective here was to develop a weight-based hydration management intervention and evaluate the impact of this on the incidence of acute confusion (AC) using an N = 98. The intervention consisted of a fluid intake goal based on 100 ml per kg for the first 10 kg, 50 ml/kg for the next 10 kg, and 15 ml for the remaining body weight. The treatment group received instruction and assistance on the fluid goal and the control group received routine care. Measurements included serum electrolytes, bioimpedance analysis, urinalysis, Mini-Mental State Exam, and the NEECHAM. There was no difference in the incidence of AC between treatment and controls, but those individuals with > or = 90% compliance demonstrated higher ECF volumes and also lower urine leukocyte counts.Reduced thirst after water deprivation in healthy elderly men.To determine whether responses to dehydration are altered with age, we investigated the thirst, fluid and electrolyte responses, and hormonal responses to 24 hours of water deprivation in seven healthy active elderly men (67 to 75 years old) and seven healthy young men (20 to 31 years old) who were matched for weight loss during water deprivation. After water deprivation, the older men had greater increases in plasma osmolality, sodium concentration, and vasopressin levels. However, their urinary osmolality was lower and they were less thirsty and drank less after water deprivation, so that their plasma and urine were not diluted to predeprivation levels. Regression analysis indicated increased sensitivity of vasopressin osmoreceptors in the older group, although this difference was not statistically significant. We conclude that after 24 hours of water deprivation, there is a deficit in thirst and water intake in healthy elderly men, as compared with younger men, although vasopressin osmoreceptor responsiveness is maintained or even increased. Our findings also suggest that the well-known deficit in urinary concentrating ability that occurs with age reflects renal causes and not a lack of circulating vasopressin.The effect of xanthines on fluid balance.To determine whether drinks containing caffeine and theophylline cause more fluid loss than equivalent amounts of non-xanthine drinks, a convenience sample of 30 adults between the ages of 57 and 81 was selected. Subjects were picked for 2 groups: those who had developed tolerance to these xanthines and used them freely (the X Group) and those who habitually omitted drinks containing xanthines from their diets (the NO X Group). Both groups consumed approximately 2 liters of fluid daily for 5 days. When overall means were compared by analysis of variance, the two groups did not differ on serum osmolality for Day 5, change in serum osmolality (from Day 0 to Day 5), adjusted I/O ratio, percent weight change from Day 0, or percent weight change from previous day. Analysis of the same variables on a daily basis indicated that the X group was better hydrated on Day 4.Evaluating the reliability and utility of cumulative intake and output.During times of scarce resources available for providing patient care, it becomes necessary to validate the effectiveness of standard practices that consume caregivers' time and efforts. Three nurse managers of nursing units serving diverse patient populations studied the effectiveness of continuous intake and output in estimating daily fluid balance. They examined 48-hour records of daily weight and intake and output of 73 patients and correlated the two. Their findings suggest that even when caregiver charting compliance is optimal, daily intake and output recording provides unreliable results. The authors recommend daily weights alone be adopted for all patients who are not experiencing acute renal conditions.Clinical presentation of hypernatremia in elderly patients: a case control study.To assess early clinical signs and their prognostic value in elderly patients with hypernatremia.Prospective, case control study of 150 patients with hypernatremia matched to 300 controls.Multicenter study including seven short- and long-term geriatric care facilities.Clinical assessment of hydration status at bedside, such as abnormal skin turgor or dry oral mucosa.30-day mortality rate and clinical indicators (assessed at the peak of natremia) associated with mortality.Patients and controls were comparable in terms of drugs and underlying diseases, except for history of dementia, which was more frequent in patients than in controls. Patients were significantly more likely than controls to have low blood pressure, tachycardia, dry oral mucosa, abnormal skin turgor, and recent change of consciousness. Only three clinical findings were found in at least 60% of patients with hypernatremia: orthostatic blood pressure and abnormal subclavicular and forearm skin turgor. The latter two signs were significantly more frequent in patients with hypernatremia. Four other signs (tachycardia, abnormal subclavicular skin turgor, dry oral mucosa, and recent change of consciousness) had a specificity of greater than 79%. Using logistic regression, four signs were significantly and independently associated with hypernatremia: abnormal subclavicular and thigh skin turgor, dry oral mucosa, and recent change of consciousness. The mortality rate was 41.5% and was significantly higher in patients with hypernatremia. The status of consciousness when hypernatremia was diagnosed was the single prognostic indicator associated with mortality (odds ratio=2.3, 95% confidence interval=1.01-5.2).Most of the classical signs of dehydration are irregularly present in patients with hypernatremia. Caregivers should carefully screen any variations in consciousness, because they may reveal severe hypernatremia.Hydration status of community-dwelling seniors.Dehydration is the most common fluid or electrolyte disorder among older persons. This study was designed to examine the hydration status of community-dwelling seniors.Blood and urine samples were collected from 67 independently living volunteers (65-93 yrs) who had functional limitations but no condition that contraindicated 10 min of moderate exercise. Forty-six subjects who were not diabetic, had fasted for 12 hours, and had blood glucose levels < or = 115 mg/dL were thus included. Urine and serum samples were analyzed for osmolality (mosm/kg), Na+ (mmol/L) and K+ (mmol/L). Whole blood was analyzed for hemoglobin (Hb, g/dL) and hematocrit (Hct, %) and urine for specific gravity (USG). Means and standard deviations for the current data were compared with normal values.All values were within normal ranges except urine osmolality.While changes associated with aging may predispose an individual to dehydration, functionally limited, independently living older individuals demonstrate normal hydration status following a 12-hr fast. This suggests that dehydration is not solely a function of the aging process, but may be more related to concomitant medical conditions or dependent living.Rapid measurement of total body water to facilitate clinical decision making in hospitalized elderly patients.Bioelectrical impedance analysis (BIA) is a noninvasive rapid and simple bedside technique that can be used to predict total body water (TBW), extracellular water (ECW), and intracellular water (ICW) and identify altered fluid distribution following critical illness.An equivalence study of BIA in 32 hospitalized elderly patients was compared with reference standard dilutional measurements of deuterated water (TBW) and sodium bromide (ECW). The results were compared with anthropometric equations commonly used to predict TBW.There was variability in TBW content among the participating hospitalized elderly patients. This variability was within (+/-5 L) and the percent difference between the standard and BIA was as follows: mean (range) -4.1% (-18.5 to 11.2). BIA reliably predicted TBW and ECW in individual participants, whereas standard prediction equations uniformly over- or underestimated TBW in individuals and whole group population.TBW in hospitalized elderly patients can be estimated noninvasively by bedside BIA. Standardized anthropometric equations have to be used with caution in this population.The measurement of axillary moisture for the assessment of dehydration among older patients: a pilot study.Dry axilla can sometimes be found among dehydrated older patients. In this study, we measured the axillary moisture and assessed it as possible marker for dehydration.Twenty-nine older patients admitted with acute medical conditions participated in this study. Dehydration was diagnosed by the calculated serum osmolality of greater than 295 mOsm/L. The moisture of axilla was measured by a skin moisture impedance meter which was applied at the center of axilla of patients.11 patients (7 males and 4 females) were diagnosed as dehydrated and 18 patients (10 males and 8 females) were diagnosed as non-dehydrated. The mean axillary moisture (33%) in the dehydrated group was significantly lower than that (42%) in the non-dehydrated group (p<0.05). The axillary moisture ≥50% showed the sensitivity of 88%. The axillary moisture <30% showed the specificity of 91%. Use of a single cutoff value of 40% moisture produced the sensitivity of 59% and the specificity of 9%. As for the physical signs, dry axilla had also moderate sensitivity and excellent specificity to detect dehydration.The measurement of the axillary moisture could help assess dehydration. Dehydration could be ruled out when the axillary moisture ≥50%, while it could be ruled-in when the axillary moisture is <30%.Tonicity balance in patients with hypernatremia acquired in the intensive care unit.Hypernatremia is a serious electrolyte disturbance and an independent risk factor for mortality in critically ill patients. In many cases, hypernatremia is an iatrogenic problem that develops in the intensive care unit (ICU).Case series.45 patients were studied in a medical ICU. For inclusion in the study, patients needed to show an increase in serum sodium concentration to greater than 149 mEq/L from an initial concentration of less than 146 mEq/L.Solute balance, fluid balance, and both. Causes of hypernatremia.The daily mass balance of sodium, potassium, and water over 1- to 3-day intervals was measured while serum sodium levels were increasing.During the study period, 69 of 981 patients (7%) acquired hypernatremia after admission to the ICU. Of these, 45 had sufficient data for evaluation. Maximum serum sodium levels were 150 to 164 mEq/L. The average duration of hypernatremia was 2 days (range, 1 to 10 days), with an average onset on day 5.9 +/- 4.3 of the ICU stay. Patients were classified as having a positive solute balance (n = 17; 38%), negative fluid balance (n = 20; 44%), or both (n = 8; 18%). The most important extrarenal factors contributing to hypernatremia were fever (45%) and diarrhea (18%). Polyuria was observed in 38% of patients and 35% had acute renal failure. Hypertonic solutions were administered to 27% of patients.Retrospective analysis; lack of daily measurement of body weight.ICU-acquired hypernatremia is associated with multiple factors associated with negative fluid and positive solute balance.Is bioelectrical impedance vector analysis of value in the elderly with malnutrition and impaired functionality?The calculation of body composition using bioelectrical impedance analysis is difficult in the elderly because most equations have been found to be inadequate, especially in the malnourished elderly. We therefore evaluated the use of bioelectrical impedance vector analysis in elderly nursing home residents.One hundred twelve nursing home residents were included in the study (34 men, 78 women, age 85.1 y, age range 79.1-91.4 y). Nutritional status was determined by the Mini Nutritional Assessment (MNA), functional status was assessed by handgrip strength, knee extension strength, and Barthel's index, and bioelectrical impedance analysis was performed using Nutriguard M (Data Input, Darmstadt, Germany).Twenty-two nursing home residents were classified as well nourished (MNA I), 80 were considered to be at nutritional risk (MNA II), and 10 were classified as malnourished (MNA III). Handgrip strength, knee extension strength, and Barthel's index were lower in MNA II and MNA III than in MNA I. Phase angle also decreased significantly with the MNA (4.0, 3.8-4.7 degrees; 3.7, 3.3-4.3 degrees; and 2.9, 2.6-3.5 degrees). There was a significant displacement of the mean vector in MNA II and MNA III compared with MNA I.The bioelectrical impedance vector analysis resistance/reactance graph could represent a valuable tool to assess changes in body cell mass and hydration status in elderly nursing home residents.Physician misdiagnosis of dehydration in older adults.Dehydration is a difficult clinical diagnosis in older adults because the physical signs of dehydration are often confusing. The clinical consequences of a diagnosis of dehydration are critical, since dehydration implies increased morbidity and mortality and aggressive rehydration can improve clinical outcome. The diagnosis is a sentinel event for nursing homes, and often is made at transfer to a hospital.To define the accuracy of the clinical diagnosis of dehydration during hospital admission, and to observe persons admitted from long-term care.A total of 102 consecutive medical admissions in persons older than 65 years with a diagnostic coding for dehydration either on admission or during the course of hospitalization over a 3-month period at a university teaching hospital were reviewed. The diagnosis of dehydration was considered confirmed if the calculated serum osmolarity was greater than 295 milliosmols (mOsmol). Subjects were considered to have intravascular volume depletion if the ratio of blood urea nitrogen (BUN) to serum creatinine was greater than 20 or the serum sodium was greater than 145 milligrams per deciliter. Subjects were considered to have hypovolemia if the serum osmolarity was greater than 295 and the BUN/creatinine ratio was greater than 20.Among subjects with a clinical diagnosis of dehydration, only 17% had a serum osmolarity >295 mOsm, and only 11% had a serum sodium greater than 145. A BUN/creatinine ratio greater than 20 was present in 68% of the subjects. Clinicians appear to be using the term dehydration synonymously with intravascular volume depletion. Even so, at least a third of the diagnoses of intravascular volume depletion in older adults were incorrect based on laboratory data.Physicians who diagnose dehydration during hospital admission may be relying more on physical signs than laboratory data. Little change in laboratory markers for hydration status occurs from the time of diagnosis to hospital discharge, suggesting that the clinical diagnosis does not affect fluid management. The data suggest a need for improvement in the differential diagnosis and management of volume changes in older persons.Urine osmolality in the elderly.Investigation was done in the institutionalized elderly in order to know the value of urine osmolality in this population.Cross sectional study was done in the government institutionalized elderly that localized in South Jakarta. By using simple random sampling, 50 elderly people were chosen from all of the residents in this institutionalized elderly aged more than 60 years. They were excluded if they had diabetes mellitus, abnormal cortisol (reference range of morning cortisol, 5-25 ug/dL), potassium less than 3 meq/L, chronic diarrhoe, congestive heart failure, nephrotic syndrome, and cirrhosis of the liver, and also if they were in manitol or diuretic treatment, and not cooperative. All of these data were analyzed with descriptive analysis and comparative T-test of two non-related groups.There were 28 elderly peoples consisted of 13 males and 15 females participated in this study. The mean of the urine osmolality was 581 +/- 174 mosmol/Kg. The mean of the urine osmolality in the female group (657.33 +/- 126.54 mosmol/kg) was significantly higher than in the male group (p = 0.01).The urine osmolality in the elderly is high and the so-called normal value is 407-755 mosmol/Kg. Further study is needed to investigate the lowest urine osmolality value as the diagnostic tool of hyponatremia due to water excretion disorder in the elderly.Sensitivity and specificity of clinical signs for assessment of dehydration in endurance athletes.To investigate the diagnostic accuracy of commonly used signs of dehydration in marathon runners.The diagnostic accuracy of 5 clinical signs/symptoms thought to indicate dehydration (altered skin turgor, dry oral mucous membranes, sunken eyes, an inability to spit and the sensation of thirst) was assessed by comparing the presence of these markers with the criterion standard of body weight change over a marathon footrace.2006 Auckland Marathon.606 competitors in the full marathon.Body weight was measured before and immediately after the marathon. The 5 clinical signs/symptoms were assessed immediately after the marathon.Diagnostic accuracy of clinical signs/symptoms to detect dehydration greater than 3% of body weight. Results 606 complete data sets were obtained. 3 clinical signs were associated with greater percentage weight loss: sunken eyes (mean percentage weight loss with symptom 2.6% (standard deviation 1.5), without 2.3% (1.5)); decreased skin turgor (with 3.0% (1.4), without 2.3% (1.5)) and the sensation of thirst (with 2.5% (1.5), without 2.3% (1.5)). The ability to spit and dry oral mucous membranes were unrelated to percentage weight loss. No signs/symptoms showed acceptably high validity for detecting a weight loss equal to or greater than 3% of body weight.The 5 parameters (decreased skin turgor, sensation of thirst, sunken eyes, inability to spit and dry mucous membranes) tested in this study did not precisely identify runners with total weight loss >3% at the end of a marathon.Response to dehydration in elderly patients in long-term care.Elderly patients in long-term care have a high plasma osmolality (pOSM) and associated increased mortality. In these patients, we examined pOSM, thirst (visual analogue scale, VAS) and arginine vasopressin (AVP) response to 16-hour dehydration and 2-hour rehydration. Twelve patients were randomly divided into two groups (A & B). Group A had their fluid balance monitored for two weeks, group B did not. Single measurements of VAS, pOSM and AVP were conducted on days 0, 7 and 13. Dehydration tests were conducted in both groups at the start of the study (DAY 1), and at the end of the two-week period (DAY 14). There were no significant differences between group A and B, so the results are presented for the two groups combined. There was a significant increase in both pOSM and VAS during dehydration, and a significant fall in both variables during rehydration [F (9,99) = 18.69, p < 0.001, and F(9,99) = 11.25, p < 0.001, respectively]. Plasma AVP did not change significantly during either dehydration or rehydration [F (9,99) = 0.59, p = 0.8]. There were no significant differences in response for any of the three variables between DAY 1 and DAY 14. We conclude that elderly patients in long-term care exhibit changes in thirst and osmolality during dehydration and rehydration, and that these responses are reproducible. The lack of a significant AVP response requires further investigation.